 Currently, we have mice that are four months old and previously were diabetic and now are not.
 The research is still in its early stages, as Dr Ehud Ur, a lecturer in the faculty of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and director of the clinical and scientific Department of the Canadian Diabetes Association, will tell you.
 Like other specialists, he is sceptical about whether diabetes can be cured and points out that these findings are not relevant to people who already have type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Sara Danius, the permanent Secretary of the Swedish Academy, said in a radio interview with Sveriges, in Sweden, that the Academy had given up trying to contact Bob Dylan.
 Danius declared, I'm not doing anything at the moment, I called and sent Emails to his closest assistant and got very cordial replies.
 Before, Ring's executive director, Jamie Siminoff, mentioned that the company had started to rack its brains after the doorbell of its shop in the garage could not be heard.
 He said he built a Wifi-Door-Bell.
 Siminoff declared that sales skyrocketed after his appearance on an episode of Shark Tank in 2013, in which the television show's panel of investors refused to fund the company.
 Towards the end of 2017, Siminoff made an appearance on the television shopping channel, QVC.
 Ring also reached a settlement in the lawsuit with the competing security company, ADT Corporation.
 Today, no drug has been proven to be adequate for treating the infection caused by Ebola, although there is an experimental vaccine that seems to be able to decrease the mortality caused by this disease.
 Zmapp, a combination of antibodies, had a promising early field result, but formal studies showed it was less beneficial than hoped to prevent death.
 In the PALM trial, the function of Zmapp was to control, that is, the scientists used it as a baseline and compared it to the other three treatments.
 USA Gymnastics supports the statement of the United States Olympic Committee and recognizes that it is imperative for the Olympic family to foster a safe and healthy environment for all of our athletes.
 We agree with the USOC's statement that the interests of athletes, clubs and their sports can be best served by advancing meaningful change within our organization, rather than by withdrawing certifications.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that can shed light on how the abuse of the proportion that Larry Nassa's survivors described with such courage could have gone on for so long and accepts any necessary and appropriate change.
 The goal of USA Gymnastics and the U.S. Olympic Committee is the same: to make gymnastics and other sports as safe as possible for athletes to pursue their dreams in a protected, positive and enhanced environment.
 During the 1960s, Brzezinski worked for John F. Kennedy as an advisor and later for the administration of Lyndon B. Johnson.
 He advised Carter on foreign policy in the 1976 elections, and then worked as a national security advisor to Henry Kissinger from 1977 to 1981.
 As a national security advisor, he assisted Carter in the diplomatic handling of international affairs, such as the 1978 Camp David Accords, the normalization of U.S. relations with China in the late 1970s, the Iranian Revolution of 1979, which led to the Iran hostage crisis, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 The film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, was nominated in all the most important categories.
 Gosling and Stone were nominated for Best Actor and Best Actress, respectively.
 Among the other nominations are best picture, best director, best cinematography, best costume design, best editing, best original score, best production design, best editing, best sound mixing, and best original screenplay.
 Two songs were nominated for best original song: Audition and City of stars. The studio Lionsgate was nominated 26 times, beating out any other studio.
 On Sunday night, in a statement released through the press Secretary, the President of the United States, Donald Trump, announced that U S . troops would be withdrawn from Syria.
 The announcement came after a telephone conversation that Trump had with the President of Turkey, Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey would also assume the custody of the Isis fighters who were captured, and to whom European nations, as the statement says, denied their repatriation.
 In addition to confirming that at least some dinosaurs were feathered, a theory already generalized, it also offers specific data that fossils generally do not, such as their color and three-dimensional structure.
 According to specialists, this animal has a plumage of a reddish-brown color on the upper part and a paler or carotenoid tint on the lower part.
 The discovery also helps to better understand the evolution of bird feathers.
 Given that the feathers of dinosaurs do not have a well-developed rachis, but do have other features of feathers, such as barbs and barbules,
 The structure of the feathers suggests that their function was not related to flight, but rather to regulate or indicate the temperature.
 The experts' comments were that, although it is the tail of a short-lived dinosaur, the specimen illustrates more the plumage of an adult than that of a chick.
 In the morning of yesterday, in Gaziantep, Turkey, a car bomb killed two police officers and injured more than twenty others.
 The government reported that nineteen of the injured were police officers.
 The police said the suspect in the attack is a suspected Daesh militant.
 It was discovered that the sun was governed by the same basic principles as other stars: the only factors that drove its activity within the system were its luminosity and its rotation.
 The intensity of the light and rotation are combined to calculate a star's Rossby number, which is linked to the plasma's flow.
 The fewer the number of Rossby, the less active the star is in relation to its magnetic inversions.
 Iwasaki faced numerous problems during his voyage.
 He was attacked by pirates, bitten by a rabid dog in Tibet, escaped from a marriage in Nepal, and was stopped by the police in India.
 The 802.11n standard works in both the 2.4Ghz and 5.0Ghz frequency bands.
 This will make it compatible with earlier versions of 802.11a, 802.11b, and 802.11g, as long as the base station has dual radios.
 The speeds of the 802.11n standard are much higher than those achieved by its predecessors, with a theoretical maximum throughput of 600 Mbps.
 Duvall, who is married and has two grown children, did not make a good impression on Miller, who was the one to tell him the story.
 When asked for a comment, Miller said, quote, Mike talks a lot during the hearing . He was preparing me, so I really couldn't hear what he was saying.
 We will work hard to reduce the level of carbon dioxide emitted per unit of GDP by 2020, so that the difference will be significant compared with 2005.
 He did not mention a figure for the cuts, and said they would be based on China's economic output.
 Hu incentivized developing states to not return to the traditional path of first polluting and then cleaning up.
 And yet, he added, it is not right to demand of them obligations that go beyond their stage of development, their level of responsibility, and their capacities.
 The Iraq Study Group released its report at 12:00 GMT.
 Nobody can give any guarantees that an Iraqi action at this point will stop sectarian fighting, the increasing violence or a slide towards chaos.
 The report begins with a call for open debate and a consensus in the United States about Middle East policies.
 The report is highly critical of virtually every aspect of the executive power's policy in Iraq, and calls for an immediate change of direction.
 It contains 78 recommendations, of which the number one is the adoption of a new initiative before the end of the year with the purpose of protecting Irak's borders from hostile operations and to restore diplomatic ties with its neighbors.
 Cristina Fernández de Kirchner, who at the time is a senator and the first lady of Argentina, announced last night in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers from Buenos Aires, that she will run for the Presidency.
 The Teatro Argentino was the place where Mrs . Kirchner announced her intention to run for President, and this is the same place where she began her campaign for the Senate in the year 2005, representing the province of Buenos Aires.
 The issue that sparked the debate was the controversy over the budget allocated for the relief and reconstruction following Hurricane Katrina, which some fiscal conservatives dubbed the New Orleans Bush spending.
 The criticisms of the liberals in relation to the works of restoration have their focus in the fact that they have awarded reconstruction contracts to people who, apparently, are functionaries of Washington.
 More than four million people gathered in Rome to witness the funeral.
 So many people were there that not everyone could get into the funeral at St . Peter's square.
 They set up large television screens in different parts of Rome so that everyone could watch the ceremony.
 In many other Italian cities, as well as in the world, in particular in Poland, similar montages were carried out, which saw many, many people.
 Historians criticize the FBI's past policies for concentrating its resources on easy-to-solve cases, especially car thefts, in order to improve its success rate.
 In the fiscal year 2005, Congress began funding the campaign against obscenity and gave the FBI the instruction to assign 10 agents to deal with pornography for adults.
 Robin Uthappa scored the highest in the innings, with 70 runs, hitting 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 The performance of both Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, middle order batsmen, was good and they scored a century-long partnership.
 But after losing the captain's wicket, India could only manage 36 runs and 7 of their wickets were bowled out to end the innings.
 The U S . President, George W . Bush, arrived in Singapore early on November 16, beginning a seven-day tour of Asia.
 He was welcomed by Singapore's deputy Prime Minister, Wong Kan Seng, and debated trade and terrorism with the head of state, Lee Hsien Loong.
 After a week of midterm election defeats, Bush gave a speech to the audience about the expansion of trade in the Asian continent.
 Stephen Harper, the Prime Minister, agreed to send the government's Clean Air Act to a committee where all parties are represented before second reading, and after the 25-minute meeting at the PMO on Tuesday with Jack Layton, the NDP leader.
 During the meeting with the Prime Minister, Layton had requested that changes be made to the Conservatives' environmental law, appealing to a "thorough and complete redrafting of it.
 Since the Federal Government intervened and took over the financing of the Mersey hospital in Davenport, Tasmania, state authorities and some Federal members of Parliament have called the move a deception, with an eye to the Federal elections in November.
 However, Prime Minister John Howard stated that the only purpose of the law was to protect the hospital from degradation by the Tasmanian government,
 According to the latest report, sea level readings indicate the formation of a tsunami, and there was some tsunami activity detected in the vicinity of Pago Pago and Niue.
 No major damage or injuries were reported in Tonga, but the power supply was temporarily disrupted, which, it is assumed, frustrated the Tongan authorities' receipt of the PTWC tsunami warning.
 Fourteen schools in the Hawaii area or near it closed completely on Wednesday, despite the warnings.
 President George W . Bush welcomed the announcement.
 Gordon Johndroe, a spokesman for Bush, referred to the North Korean commitment as an important step towards the goal of achieving a verifiable denuclearization of the Korean peninsula.
 Today, a new storm originated in the Atlantic Ocean, becoming the tenth named storm of its hurricane season, which has been designated Subtropical Storm Jerry.
 The National Hurricane Center said at this point that Jerry is expected to make landfall.
 According to estimates by the United States Corps of engineers, up to 6 inches of rain could seep through the previously damaged levees.
 Due to the overflow of the dam that is near the Ninth Ward, water is now reaching the waist in that area, which had already suffered flooding of up to 20 feet during Hurricane Katrina.
 The water flows over the dam in a stretch that is 100 feet wide.
 Adam Cuerden, the Commons administrator, expressed his frustration over the deletions in a statement he made to Wikinwes last month.
 In essence, he lied from the beginning, pretending to do so for legal reasons, while pretending to pay us attention until the moment he deleted the artistic content.
 The outcry from the community led to the current efforts to draft a policy on the site's sexual content, which hosts millions of openly licensed media.
 Although it was an eminently theoretical work, the program was drafted with the intention of simulating the observations made to the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 It would be the tidal forces between the dark matter in the Galaxy and the Milky way that would cause the effect that the group of scientists are expecting.
 The Milky way influences the Sagittarius Galaxy in the same way that the moon exerts a gravitational pull on our planet and causes the tides.
 The experts concluded that dark matter interacts with itself in the same way that regular matter does.
 This theory holds that most of the dark matter surrounding a galaxy is in a kind of halo and consists of numerous small particles.
 You can see white smoke coming out of the plant on television coverage.
 The local government warns residents living near the plant not to leave their homes, keep air conditioners off and not to consume tap water.
 According to Japan's nuclear agency, radioactive cesium and iodine have been found in the plant.
 According to authorities, it is believed that the containers at the site that have uranium fuel could have ruptured and leaked.
 Extremely drug resistant tuberculosis was first detected by Dr Tony Moll in the South African area of Zululandia.
 During an interview, he noted that the new variant was generating a lot of concern and alarm, given its high rate of mortality.
 The doctor thinks some patients may have caught the virus inside the hospital and that at least two of the infected were health care workers at that hospital.
 In a year, an infected person can infect between 10 and 15 people with whom he or she has had close contact.
 But the percentage of XDR-TB in the total TB population still seems to be low, 6000 out of a total of 333,000 individuals infected at one point in time in South Africa.
 The satellites, which weighed over 1,000 pounds and traveled at nearly 17,500 miles per hour, collided at an altitude of 491 miles.
 According to experts, the explosion that resulted from the collision was massive.
 And yet, despite the fact that we're still trying to figure out how important it was and how it will affect the planet,
 The U S . strategic command, which depends on the Department of defense, is doing a sweep of the wreckage.
 The results of the tracking analysis will be made available on a publicly accessible Website.
 The authorities in Ohio reported that a physician who worked at the children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, will be charged with aggravated homicide after the body of his mother was found in the trunk of his car on Wednesday.
 Dr . Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found in Blue Ash, Ohio, a suburb located about 15 miles north of Cincinnati, lying on the side of the road, wearing a T-shirt and underwear, and in apparent state of overdose.
 He led the officers to his black Oldsmobile Intrigue, which was parked 500 feet away.
 There, they discovered the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, 53, covered with blood-stained sheets.
 The police stated that the corpse had been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the disease during this season were recorded towards the end of July.
 Pigs are the carriers of the disease, which then migrates to humans via mosquitoes.
 The outbreak has led Indian authorities to take measures such as deploying pig hunters, distributing thousands of mosquito nets to the population and using pesticides in the worst-affected areas.
 The authorities have also guaranteed several million vials of the vaccine to fight encephalitis, which will allow sanitary companies to prepare for next year.
 This year, the scarcity of monetary resources and the low priority, compared to other diseases, have caused delays in the execution of the vaccine delivery plans in the historically most vulnerable regions.
 In 1956, Słonia moved to Sweden, where, after three years, he got a job at the Swedish postal office and there became chief engraver.
 The amount of stamps he made, for both Sweden and 28 other nations, is more than a thousand.
 The quality and level of detail in his work are so recognized that he has become one of the few "household names" among philatelists.
 Included in the Guinness book of world records, his one thousandth stamp was the formidable Memorable Achievements of the Swedish Kings,
 In addition, he has had a role in the design of many state bills, the most recent examples being the portraits of the Prime Minister visible on the obverse of the new 5 and 100 Canadian dollar bills.
 After the accident, Gibson was rushed to a hospital, where he died shortly after.
 The driver of the truck, a 64-year-old man, was uninjured in the accident.
 They removed the vehicle from the scene around 12:00 GMT the same day.
 An employee of a nearby garage stated, quote, there were kids waiting to cross the street, and they were all screaming and crying.
 All rushed back from the scene of the accident.
 Other topics on the agenda in Bali are saving the forests that still exist on the planet and sharing technologies to help developing nations grow in a less polluting way.
 The UN intends to complete a fund of assistance to the countries victimized by the effects of global warming, in order to be able to face its impact.
 Money could be spent on flood-proofing homes, better water management and diversifying crops.
 Fluke wrote that the efforts of some to silence women who speak out about their health did not succeed.
 He concluded this based on the large number of positive and encouraging comments from women and men urging that contraceptive medicines be considered as a health care necessity.
 Once the fighting had ceased, after the injured had been taken to the hospital, about 40 of the remaining prisoners remained in the yard, resisting their return to their cells.
 Although the negotiators tried to compose the situation, the demands of the prisoners are confusing.
 The inmates set the fire between 10:00 and 11:00 p.m. MDT.
 Quickly, agents armed with anti-riot gear entered the yard and beat down the inmates with tear gas.
 The firefighters managed to extinguish the fire at 11:35 p.m.
 With the construction of the dam in 1963, the seasonal flooding that left sediments along the river was stopped.
 This sediment was necessary for the formation of sand banks and beaches, which, in turn, functioned as habitats for wildlife.
 As a result, two species of fish have been extinguished and two others are in danger of extinction, including the gila cypha.
 Although the water level will only rise a few feet past the flooding, officials expect it to reach and rebuild the deteriorated sand banks downriver.
 No tsunami alerts have been issued or will be issued, as the earthquake did not reach the magnitude of 6.5 required to do so.
 Even though there was no tsunami threat, residents began to panic and leave their businesses and homes.
 Although Winfrey wept at her farewell, she assured her fans that she would be back.
 This is not a farewell, it's just the end of one chapter and the beginning of another.
 The comfortable re-election of the incumbent, Hifikepunye Pohamba, was confirmed by the final results of Namibia's parliamentary and presidential elections.
 The ruling party, the South West Africa People's Organization, also won the majority of seats in the National Assembly.
 The coalition and Afghan troops have moved into the region to secure the place and other coalition aircraft have been sent to assist them.
 The accident took place high up in the mountains, and it is believed to have been caused by an enemy fire.
 The efforts to find the site of the accident must contend with the bad weather and the rugged terrain.
 The Mangola Association, Doctors Without Borders and the World Health Organization have called it the worst outbreak in the country.
 The spokesman for Medecins Sans Frontieres, Richard Veerman, commented, Angola is heading towards the worst outbreak it has ever faced and the situation continues to be very serious.
 The games started at 10 a.m., accompanied by good weather, and, except for a light shower in the middle of the morning, which soon passed, it was an ideal day for Rugby 7s.
 South Africa, the tournament's top seed, started well by winning a comfortable 26-0 against Zambia, who are ranked fifth.
 Although they showed a lack of spark against their Southern sisters, South Africa improved as the tournament progressed.
 His disciplined defense, his ball handling skills and the excellent teamwork led them to stand out and it was clear that this was the team to defeat.
 Authorities in Amsterdam and the Anne Frank House museum say a fungus has infected the tree and it is dangerous to public health because it is at risk of falling.
 His logging was scheduled for Tuesday, but was saved after an emergency court ruling.
 The diameter of all the entrances to the cave, known as the Seven Sisters, is at least 100 to 250 metres.
 As the infrared images come in, the temperature variations during the day and night indicate that they are probably caves.
 During the day, its temperature is lower than that of the surface around it, and at night, higher.
 Although its thermal behavior is not as regular as the large caves on our planet, which usually maintain a fairly stable temperature, it is consistent with these deep cavities in the ground,
 In France, elections have traditionally been a low-tech affair: voters seal themselves in a booth and drop a pre-printed slip of paper into an envelope.
 After officials verify the identity of the person who is presenting to vote, the voter inserts the ballot into the voting machine and signs the list of voters.
 The French electoral law establishes the procedures quite strictly.
 Since 1988, the urns have to be transparent, allowing voters and observers to verify that no ballots are added at the beginning of the vote and that no others are added than those of the voters, duly counted and authorized.
 Candidates are allowed to send representatives to monitor each stage of the process, and during the night, volunteers count the votes under strict supervision and according to specific procedures.
 ASUS Eee PC, which was previously launched globally for its cost-saving and functionality, became the subject of heated debates at the Information Technology Expo in Taipei 2007.
 But the market for laptop consumers drastically versified and changed after ASUS received the Award for Sustainable Development from the Executive Yuan of the Republic of China in 2007.
 The station's Website describes the show as a, quote, old-school radio drama with a smart, new, and offensive twist.
 In its early days, the show was only broadcast on the Internet radio station, TogiNet Radio, a long-running space focused on the spoken word format.
 In the late nineteen eighty s, TogiNet installed AstroNet Radio as a subsidiary.
 Originally, the show featured amateur voice actors from the East Texas area.
 It was reported that the widespread looting extended throughout the night, as there was no police presence in the streets of Bishkek.
 An observer described Bishkek as sinking into a state of anarchy, with groups of people wandering the streets and looting shops.
 Several residents of Bishkek blamed the protesters in the South for the outbreak.
 South Africa defeated the All Blacks of New Zealand in a Rugby Union match of the three nations, at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustenburg, South Africa.
 The final score indicated a one-point victory, 21 to 20, ending the All Blacks' 15-game winning streak.
 In the case of the Springboks, it meant overcoming a run of five consecutive losses.
 It was the last game for the All Blacks, who had already won the trophy two weeks earlier.
 The final of the series will be played at Ellis Park, Johannesburg, next week, in a clash between the Springboks and Australia.
 A moderate earthquake shook the West of Montana at 10:08 p.m. on Monday.
 Neither the U S . Geological Survey nor its National Earthquake Information Center has reported damage.
 The epicenter of the quake was located nearly 20 kilometers northeast of Dillon and almost 65 kilometers south of Butte.
 They confirmed that the deadly avian flu strain in humans, H5N1, attacked a wild duck that died, found Monday in a pond near Lyon, in eastern France.
 France is ranked seventh among the European Union countries in terms of victims, behind Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 The outbreaks in Croatia and Denmark have not yet been confirmed as H5N5.
 Chambers's claim against God was founded on the death, destruction and terror of millions and millions of people on the planet.
 Chambers, agnostic, argues that his claim has no merit and that anyone can sue anyone.
 The story told by Camille Saint-Saens's opera is that of an artist whose life is prescribed by love, drugs and Japan.
 As a consequence, artists smoke cannabis cigarettes on stage and the show encourages the audience to do the same.
 The former Speaker of the House, Newt Gingrich, the governor of Texas, Rick Perry, and Michele Bachmann, a member of Congress, took fourth, fifth, and sixth place, respectively.
 After the results came in, Gingrich praised Santorum, but launched a withering attack on Romney, whose campaign ads had aired negative ads against Gingrich in Iowa.
 Perry stated, I'm going to Texas to evaluate the results of today's election and determine if there's a path I should follow.
 Bachmann, who had won the Ames Straw Poll in August, decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was taken to Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he later died.
 According to reports, he was in his early twenties, and Bieber stated in a statement, "[While] I was not present nor directly involved in this terrible accident, my thoughts and prayers are with the victim's family.
 According to the entertainment news Website TMZ, the photographer stopped the vehicle on the Sepulveda side of the boulevard and attempted to take photographs of the police stop before crossing the street and continuing, which caused the California highway patrol officer who was conducting the vehicle stop to give the photographer two warnings to return to the other side of the street.
 According to police officials, it is unlikely that the driver of the vehicle that struck the photographer will be prosecuted.
 With only eighteen medals available per day, there are several countries that have not yet reached the top of the medal table.
 Included are the Netherlands, with Anna Jochemsen, who yesterday placed ninth in the women's Super-G, and Finland, with Katjia Saarinen in tenth place in the same event.
 Mitchell Gourley, of Australia, placed eleventh in the men's super-giant slalom standing event, while the Czech competitor, Oldrich Jelinek, finished in the twelfth place in the men's super-giant slalom sitting event.
 Arly Velásquez, of Mexico, obtained the fifteenth position in the men's Super-G. Adam Hall, of New Zealand, finished in the ninth place in the men's Super-G.
 The visually impaired skier, Maciej Krezel, and his guide, Anna Ogarzynska, from Poland, finished in thirteenth place in the Super-G.
 After the 2010 earthquake, UN peacekeepers arrived in Haiti and were blamed for spreading the disease, as the first cases were registered near their camp.
 According to the demand, the UN camp's waste was not sanitized correctly, causing the bacteria to enter the Artibonite River, one of Haiti's most caudalous rivers.
 Prior to the arrival of the peacekeeping forces, Haiti had not faced a cholera outbreak since the nineteenth century.
 The Institute for Justice and Democracy in Haiti has mentioned the existence of independent trials that point to the Nepalese UN peacekeeping battalion as the one that inadvertently introduced the disease to Haiti.
 According to Danielle Lantagne, a disease specialist who works for the UN, it's likely the outbreak was caused by the peacekeepers.
 Hamilton confirmed that the Howard University hospital had admitted the patient and that his condition was stable.
 The patient had been in Nigeria, where there had been some cases of Ebola.
 The hospital has followed infection control protocols, including keeping the patient away from other patients to prevent infections.
 Previously, Simon had held several jobs in other television shows, in various capacities.
 In the eighty s, he lent his collaboration in several programs, for example, Taxi, Cheers and the Tracy Ullman show.
 In 1989, he helped with the creation of the Simpsons, along with Brooks and Groening, and was responsible for hiring the show's first writing team.
 Although he left the show in 1993, he retained the title of executive producer and continued to receive tens of millions of dollars in royalties season after season.
 The news agency Xinhua had reported the hijacking of a plane.
 According to subsequent reports, the aircraft received a bomb threat and was diverted back to Afghanistan, where it landed in Kandahar.
 Preliminary reports indicate the aircraft was diverted back to Afghanistan after it was denied permission to make an emergency landing in Urumqi.
 Air crashes are common in Iran, which has an old and poorly maintained fleet, serving both civilian and military operations.
 The sanctions imposed at international level have translated into the impossibility of acquiring new aircraft.
 Three people were killed and three others injured in a police helicopter crash earlier this week.
 Last month, Iran experienced one of its worst air disasters in years when a passenger plane heading to Armenia crashed, killing all 168 passengers on board.
 The same month, another passenger plane overshot a runway in Mashhad and crashed into a wall, killing 17.
 Aerosmith cancelled the remaining concerts of their tour.
 The rock band had scheduled a tour of the U S. and Canada that would end on September 16.
 The reason for the cancellation of the tour was Steven Tyler's injury, when he fell off the stage during a performance on August 5.
 After both players held all of the set's service games, Murray lost the first set by a sudden death.
 Although Del Potro held an early advantage in the second set, this also fell subject to a tie-break after reaching 6-6.
 At the time of the injury, Del Potro was leading the match,
 The program began at 8:30 p.m. local time,
 Famous national singers performed bhajans, or devotional songs, at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 The singer Sanju Sharma inaugurated the event and was followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary, who also sang the chhappan bhog bhajan, along with the singer Raju Khandelwal.
 After this, Lakkha Singh took the lead in singing the bhajans.
 Baba Shyam was honored with 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog, which, in Hindu religion, consists of 56 different edibles, such as sweets, fruits, nuts, dishes, among others, that are served as an offering to the deity.
 In addition, Lakkha Singh performed the chhappan bhog bhajan along with the singer Raju Khandewak.
 On Thursday, at the Tokyo Game Show, Nintendo's President, Satoru Iwata, unveiled the design of the controller for the company's new Revolution Console.
 As for the control, it is similar to a remote control of a television, and is provided with two sensors located near the user's television, allowing the triangulation of its position in a three-dimensional space.
 This will allow players to control actions and movements in video games by moving the device through the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella was unable to keep control of the vehicle and abandoned the race shortly after the start.
 Fernando Alonso, his teammate, led for most of the race, but had to give up the lead just after his pit stop, likely due to a badly damaged right rear tire.
 Michael Schumacher retired shortly after Alonso, due to a suspension failure,
 According to a transcript of the press conference, he said, quote, she was very beautiful and, in addition, she sang quite well.
 Every time we did a rehearsal of this, it moved me to the very depths of my soul.
 Approximately 3 minutes after takeoff, a camera inside the tank showed numerous pieces of insulating foam falling off the fuel tank.
 In any case, it is believed that they have not caused any damage to the shuttle.
 Nasa's Wayne Hale, who was in charge of the shuttle program, said the foam had fallen off in a way that was not a concern.
 Five minutes into the show, a wind that had reached 70 kilometres per hour,
 I lost my sister and her friend, and, on my way back, I saw two people in wheelchairs and the others were jumping on them and pushing them.
 In addition, NHK indicated that the Kashiwazaki-Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co stated that the earthquake did not cause any incidents and that reactors 1 and 2 of its Shika nuclear power plant were shut down.
 Around 9,400 homes in the region are reported to be without water and around 100 without electricity.
 Some routes were damaged, train service was disrupted in the affected areas, and the Noto airport in Ishikawa Prefecture remains closed.
 A bomb was detonated at the door of the governor-general's office.
 Three other bombs were detonated in the vicinity of government buildings within a two-hour period.
 Although there are reports that the official death toll is eight and the authorities have confirmed that around 30 people were injured, the official death toll and the number of injured people are still unknown.
 They found concentrations of cyanide and melamine in the urine samples of animals that had died after eating contaminated pet food.
 The researchers indicated that the two compounds react with each other to give rise to crystals that can obstruct kidney function.
 The specialists detected the formation of crystals in the cats' urine, by the incorporation of melamine and cyanuric acid.
 When compared through the use of infrared spectroscopy, it was determined that the composition of the crystals matched that found in the urine of affected pets.
 I do not know if you have noticed it or not, but most of the products coming from Central America arrived in this country free of taxes.
 Even so, the countries of Central America put tariffs on eighty percent of the products we make, and treat us like we're their own.
 I thought it was a bit of a stretch, and I said, no, that's not going to work.
 The only thing I say to people is that you treat us the same way that we treat you.
 A proposed law was dictated by the governor of California, Arnold Schwarzenegger, which does not allow the sale or rental of violent Video-Games to minors.
 The bill requires violent Video games that are sold in the state of California to be labeled with a sticker that reads,
 The director of the Prosecution, Kier Starmer QC, made a statement this morning informing that Huhne and Pryce would be brought to trial.
 Huhne has resigned, and Ed Davey MP will replace him in the cabinet, with Norman Lamb MP expected to take over as Minister of State for Business.
 The 16th of February is the date set for Huhne and Pryce to appear before the Westminster magistrates' court.
 Nicholas Alden and Zachary Cuddeback, aged 25 and 21 respectively, died in the crash.
 Edgar Veguilla suffered wounds in the arm and jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider required facial reconstruction surgery.
 Uka's weapon jammed as it pointed toward the head of a fifth man, Schneider suffers permanent pain, he can't see with one of his eyes, he has a missing piece of his skull, and his face had to be reconstructed with titanium.
 Schneider testified via a virtual link from a U S . Air Force base in his home country.
 Carpanedo participated in two individual races of the championship apart from the Wednesday competition.
 The first was the Slalom, in which she got a DNF, or did not finish the first run, along with 36 of the 116 participants in that race.
 In her other event, the giant slalom, she finished tenth in the women's combined sitting with a combined time of 4:41.30, 2:11.60 minutes behind the first Austrian finalist, Claudia Loesch, and 1:09.02 minutes behind the ninth Hungarian finalist, Gyöngyi Dani.
 Four skiers in the category of sent fell short of completing their runs and a total of 45 participants out of 117 in the Slalom Gigante did not make it to the finish line.
 The Madhya Pradesh police force was able to recover the stolen laptop and cell phone.
 The assistant inspector general, D.K. Arya, said, we have arrested five individuals who abused the Swiss woman and recovered her mobile phone and laptop.
 Baba, Bhutha, Rampro, Gaza, and Vishnu Kanjar are the accused.
 According to the superintendent of police, Chandra Shekhar Solanki, the accused appeared in court with their faces covered.
 Despite the fact that there were three people inside the house at the time of the car's impact, none of them suffered any injuries.
 But the driver suffered serious head injuries.
 The road where the accident occurred was temporarily closed while emergency services extracted the driver of the red Audi TT.
 At first, he was transferred to the James Paget hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's hospital in Cambridge.
 Since then, Adekoya has been in the Edinburgh sheriff court, accused of the murder of her son.
 While she is in custody awaiting the accusation and trial, any statement by an eyewitness may be questionable, since her image has been the subject of widespread publicity.
 It is a common practice in other parts of the United Kingdom, but as Scottish justice operates in a different way, the courts considered the publication of photographs to be potentially prejudicial.
 The professor Pamela Ferguson of the University of Dundee said,
 The office of the crown, which is in charge of the proceedings, told reporters that it would make no additional comments at least until the ruling on the case is made.
 According to the information that leaked out, the document will deal with the border conflict, which Palestine intends to settle based on the pre-1967 borders.
 Other topics that were also reportedly discussed include the future status of Jerusalem, which both nations consider sacred, and the future of the Jordan Valley.
 Israel demands a constant military presence in the valley for ten years once the agreement is signed, while the PA only accepts five.
 During the pest control supplemental trial, the rangers had to supervise the shooters closely, since the shooter was being monitored and evaluated for effectiveness.
 In a partnership between NPWS and the New South Wales Association of Sporting and Target Shooters Inc, volunteers were recruited within the Association's shooting program.
 Mick O'Flynn, who is in charge, provisionally, of the conservation and heritage office of the NPWS, said that there was an integral training in safety and training for the four shooters selected for the shooting operation.
 And today, the President of Haiti, Michel Martelly, was sworn in to a new nine-member Provisional Electoral Council.
 In four years, it's the fifth CEP of Martelly.
 Last month, a presidential commission advised that the old CEP resign, as part of a series of measures to lead the country towards new elections.
 The Commission was the way in which Martelly responded to the widespread demonstrations that began in October against the regime.
 The demonstrations, in some cases violent, were provoked by the fact that elections have not been held since 2011.
 There have been about 60 cases of iPods with problems of functioning and excessive heating, which caused six incidents and minor burns to four people.
 The Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry in Japan reported 27 accidents involving these devices.
 Last week, METI announced that apple had reported 34 additional incidents of overheating, which the company categorized as not serious.
 The Ministry of Commerce issued a statement regarding the delay in the report from Apple, saying it was a truly regrettable thing.
 Mariana was shaken by a magnitude 7.1 earthquake at 7:19 p m local time on Friday.
 The agency in charge of emergency management in the Northern Mariana Islands said there were no reports of damage in the territory.
 The Pacific Tsunami Warning Center also reported no tsunami warning indicators.
 In Manila, the capital of the Philippines, a former police agent seized a bus and held hostage tourists from Hong Kong.
 Rolando Mendoza opened fire with his M16 against the foreign visitors.
 Several hostages have been rescued, and so far, it has been confirmed that at least six have died.
 Both the six hostages, among them children and the elderly, and the Filipino photographers were released early.
 The photographers then took the place of an elderly woman who needed to go to the bathroom, and Mendoza was shot.
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and began studying medicine.
 She trained in obstetrics and began working at the Auckland women's hospital around 1959.
 Liggins began her research into premature birth in her spare time, while working at the hospital.
 His study showed that fetal lung maturation in the baby could be sped up by administering a hormone.
 Xinhua reported on Wednesday that government investigators had recovered the flight recorders from the black box.
 Luna's fellow wrestlers also paid tribute to him.
 Tommy Dreamer said, quote, Luna was the first queen of the extreme. She died on the night of the two moons, something unique, like her.
 Dustin Runnels stated, quote, Luna was as rare as me, even more so.
 Since 2008, among the 1,400 people surveyed prior to the 2010 Federal elections, there was an 8% increase in those who oppose Australia becoming a Republic.
 Julia Gillard, the acting Prime Minister, stated during the 2010 Federal election campaign that she considered Australia should become a Republic once the term of Queen Elizabeth II's reign had ended.
 Thirty four percent of those surveyed share this view and want Isabel II to be the last queen of Australia.
 At one end of the survey, 29% of people think Australia should become a republic as soon as possible, at the other, 31% think it should never become a republic.
 The Olympic gold medallist had to swim the 100 and 200 metres freestyle, and three relays at the Commonwealth games, but his fitness has been questioned following his complaints.
 He has been unable to take medicines to ease the pain, because they are banned from use in the Games.
 On January 25, Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and professor of computer science at the University of Central Missouri, discovered the largest known prime number.
 Many people verified the finding through the use of various types of hardware and software and it was made public on Tuesday.
 Comets may have served as a source of water and organic matter to our planet, which has the ability to form proteins and sustain life.
 The expectation of the scientists is to understand how planets originate, in particular ours, given that comets have been smashing into the earth for a very long time.
 Cuomo, who is 53, took office at the beginning of the year and signed a bill last month that allows same-sex couples to marry.
 He called the rumors, political gossip and nonsense.
 It is rumoured that he will be standing for the Presidency in 2016.
 NextGen is a system that the Federal Aviation Administration says will reduce the distances of air routes, which will save millions of gallons of fuel per year, as well as reduce carbon emissions.
 It employs satellite technology, in contrast to the old terrestrial radar technology, in order to enable air traffic controllers to detect aircraft with greater precision and to provide pilots with more accurate data.
 No additional transportation will be implemented and trains will not stop at Wembley.
 Due to the concern generated by the possible lack of transportation, the possibility of the game being played behind closed doors, without the fans of the team, was considered.
 On Thursday, the magazine Science reported on the discovery of a new species of bird in the Ecuadorian Galapagos Islands.
 Expertise from the University of Princeton, in the USA, and from Uppsala University, in Sweden, revealed that the new species evolved in just two generations, even though it was thought to take much longer, due to reproduction between an endemic Darwin's finch, Geospiza fortes, and a migratory cactus finch, Geospiza conirostris.
 Gold can take on all sorts of shapes and curl up into tiny figures.
 Not only can it be hammered and rolled into sheets, but it can also be stretched to make a very fine wire that can be twisted and woven into a rope.
 It can be made very thin and stick to another metal, it is so thin that it used to be used to decorate the illustrations in books called illuminated manuscripts.
 This is called the pH of a chemical. You can make a pH indicator using red cabbage juice.
 The color of the cabbage juice will be altered depending on how acidic or basic the chemical is.
 The number of hydrogen ions present in the chemical being analyzed determines its pH level.
 Hydrogen atoms are made up of a proton and an electron, so a hydrogen ion is the result of stripping a proton of its electron.
 Agitate both dry powders together, and after doing so, with the hands hygienized and moist, Express them into a ball.
 There will be a reaction between the moisture in your hands and the outer layers, which will feel strange to the touch and form a sort of armor.
 The cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-daro had flush toilets in almost all the houses, which connected to a sophisticated drainage system.
 In some Minoan cities of Crete and Santorini, Greece, there are vestiges of drainage systems.
 There were also public toilets in ancient Egypt, Persia, and China, and in the Roman civilization, public baths had toilets and some were shared by men and women.
 When one is communicating with someone who is thousands of miles away, one is using a satellite.
 The satellite in space receives the call, and then it reflects it back almost instantly.
 The satellite was sent into space via a rocket, and scientists use telescopes in space, because the light from the earth's atmosphere distorts some of the light and view we have.
 A rocket of more than one hundred feet in height is required to carry a satellite or telescope into outer space.
 The wheel has modified the world in surprising ways, the most relevant of which is that it has given us a much simpler and faster way of transportation.
 Thanks to it, we now have many means of transportation, such as the railroad or the automobile, among many others.
 Below them are the moderate-sized cats that feed on medium-sized prey, from rabbits to antelopes and deer.
 Finally, there are many small cats, including domestic cats, that feed on much smaller species, such as insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 The secret of their success is the concept of a niche: each cat has a particular function, which prevents it from competing with others.
 Lions are the most social of all cats and live in groups called prides.
 The herds are made up of one to three adult males from the same family group, united with up to thirty females and their offspring.
 The females, in general, are closely related, which makes them a large family of sisters and daughters.
 The herd of lions behave in the same way as wolves or dogs, with whom they have a surprising similarity,
 The tiger is an integral athlete, having the ability to climb, swim, jump, and pull five times the weight of a robust person.
 The tiger is in the same genus as lions, leopards, and jaguars, the only four felines that can roar.
 The tiger's roar is not a fully sonorous roar like that of the lion, but rather a kind of oration of words spoken in growls and in the grit of the teeth.
 Ocelots enjoy feeding on small creatures, and will, if possible, hunt monkeys, snakes, rodents and birds, almost all of which will be much smaller than they are.
 Scientists believe that ocelots track and find animals to eat by using their sense of smell,
 They have very good night vision and in dark places, and in addition, they move very silently.
 When a small group of living things (a small population) separates from the main one from which it came,
 The new environment has different resources and competitors, and therefore a new population will need different characteristics or adaptations from those it had before to be a strong competitor.
 No changes have been made to the original population, which still require the same adaptations as in the past.
 Over time, as the incipient population adapts to the new environment, it begins to resemble the other population less and less.
 Finally, after thousands or even millions of years, the two populations will look so different that it will be impossible to catalogue them as the same species.
 This process is called speciation, which simply means the development of new species, and is an inevitable and fundamental part of evolution.
 Plants generate the oxygen that people breathe and absorb the carbon dioxide that people exhale.
 The food of plants is generated with the energy of the sun, thanks to photosynthesis, and they also give us shade.
 We build our houses from plants and with them we also make our clothes, most of the food we eat is made from plants, and without them, animals would not survive.
 The Mosasaurus was the apex predator of its time, and therefore, nothing feared it, except other Mosasaurus.
 His long jaws had incrusted more than 70 sharp teeth, plus another group of additional teeth in the palate, which translates to anything that passed in front of it, had no escape.
 We have no way of knowing, but it could have had the viperine, which included tortoises, large fish, other mosasaurs, and even could have been a cannibal.
 He also attacked any creature that entered the water, not even a dinosaur as big as the T. Rex was a threat to him.
 Although most of the food would be familiar to us, the Romans also ate some rather unconventional items at banquets, such as wild boar, peacocks, snails, and even a type of rodent, the porcupine.
 Another thing that distinguished the poor and women was that the poor and women ate sitting on a chair, while the wealthy enjoyed sharing banquets and throwing themselves on the floor while they ate.
 It is not possible that the recipes of ancient Rome included foods that came to Europe from America or Asia centuries later.
 For example, they had no corn, tomatoes, potatoes, cacao, and no Roman ever tasted a turkey.
 The Babylonians built for each of their gods a central temple considered his or her home.
 People carried out sacrifices to the gods and priests sought to satisfy the needs of those by performing ceremonies and festivals.
 The temples had an open courtyard and then a inner sanctuary which only the priests could enter.
 In some cases, special pyramid-shaped towers, called ziggurats, were built to be part of the temples.
 The upper part of the tower was a special sanctuary for their deity.
 In the middle of the warm Middle East, the house was of little importance.
 The Hebrew families spent most of their time outdoors.
 The women cooked in the yard, the shops were just showcases that gave onto the street, and the houses were built of stone.
 In the land of Canaan there were no great forests, and therefore wood was extremely expensive.
 Very few people lived in Greenland according to the Norse Sagas, Erik the Red was exiled from Iceland for murder and during a trip he made further West, he discovered the island and gave it its name.
 Even so, despite his discovery, the Eskimo tribes were already living there.
 Although each country was Scandinavian in its own right, there were marked differences in relation to the people, monarchs, habits, and history between Denmark, Sweden, Norway, and Iceland.
 If you've seen the movie National Treasure, you might think a treasure map was drawn on the back of the Declaration of Independence.
 No, though the reverse of the document does contain something written, it is not a map of a treasure.
 The Declaration of Independence has the words, written on the back, Declaration of Independence original, July 4, 1776.
 Although it is not known for certain who wrote it, it is known that the enormous parchment document, which measures 29¾ inches by 24½ inches, was rolled up for safekeeping.
 Therefore, it is probable that the annotation was added only as a label.
 Although the landings carried out during D-Day, as well as the subsequent fighting, had achieved the liberation of northern France, the south remained.
 His government was in the hands of the French of Vichy, who were a group that, in 1940, had agreed to make peace with the Germans and work with the invaders instead of fighting against them.
 On August 15, 1940, the so-called Dragon Operation was launched, through which the Allies invaded Southern France.
 In just two weeks, American and French forces had liberated the south of France and were pushing on towards Germany.
 You can define a civilization as a specific culture that a large group of people share, living and working together as a society.
 The term civilization derives from the Latin civilis, which means civil, and relates both to the word civis, of the same language, which means citizen, and to civitas, which means city or city state, and which, besides, determines in some way the size of the society.
 The city-states are the precursors of the nation, a culture of civilization implies a prolonged generational transmission of knowledge, a durable cultural legacy, and a homogeneous propagation.
 Minority cultures tend to disappear without leaving any relevant historical traces, and fail to be recognized as civilizations.
 During the Revolutionary War, the thirteen states formed, at first, a weak central government under the Articles of Confederation, in which the Congress was its only component.
 The Congress, however, did not have the power to levy taxes, and since there was no executive or judicial authority at the national level,
 He was not empowered to annul tax laws or tariffs between the states.
 The articles required the unanimous approval of all the states to proceed with their amendment, and the states cared so little for the central government that their representatives used to absent themselves.
 The Italian national football team, along with Germany, is the second most successful team in the world, having won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Among the sports that are most practiced are football, basketball, volleyball, fencing, rugby, cycling, ice hockey, and Formula 1 racing.
 Winter sports are more popular in the northern areas, with athletes participating in international tournaments and Olympic events.
 Japan is home to nearly 7,000 islands, the largest of which is Honshu.
 Due to the conglomerate of Islands it contains, Japan is often referred to as an archipelago from a geographical point of view.
 The history of Taiwan dates back to the fifteenth century, when sailors from Europe who sailed by the place registered the name of the island as Ilha Formosa, that is, beautiful Island.
 The establishment in 1624 by the Dutch East India company of a base in the South-West of Taiwan, initiated a transformation in the aboriginal method of growing crops, with the use of Chinese labour to work on their rice and sugar plantations.
 The Qing dynasty Army (1644-1912) took control of the northern and western coastal region of Taiwan in 1683 and declared Taiwan as a province of the Qing dynasty in 1885.
 In 1895, after being defeated during the First Sino-Japanese War, the Qing government adhered to the Treaty of Shimonoseki, through which it ceded sovereignty over Taiwan to Japan, who retained control of the island until 1945.
 Machu Picchu has three main structures: Intihuatana, the temple of the sun, and the temple of the three windows.
 The buildings at the ends of the complex have been reconstructed so that tourists can visualize how they originally looked.
 By 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu had been restored, and work continues today.
 To give you an example, the most common format of still photography globally is the 35 mm film size, which was the most commonly used film size towards the end of the analogue film era.
 Today it's still produced, but the most important thing is that its dimensional relationship has been transferred to the image sensor formats of Digital cameras.
 In fact, the 35 mm format is somewhat confusing, since its dimensions are 36 mm wide by 24 mm high.
 For this reason, the ratio of the aspect ratio of this format is said to be 3:2.
 Many typical formats, such as the APS group, are the same or very similar to this aspect ratio.
 The rule of thirds, which has been the subject of constant derision and has been ridiculed many times, is a simple rule that generates dynamism while allowing for some order to be given to the images.
 The most effective position to place the central object is at the intersection of the horizontal and vertical lines that divide the image into thirds.
 During this phase of European history, the Catholic Church, which had amassed wealth and power, was questioned.
 For more than a millennium, Christianity had united the European states, despite their different languages and customs.
 His power, present everywhere, affected all, from the monarch to the plebeian.
 One of the most important principles of Christianity is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and that the funds of the church should be reserved for that specific function.
 The central dome of the church had been in Rome for more than a thousand years, and this concentration of power and money made many people wonder if this principle was being respected.
 Soon after the outbreak of hostilities, the British began a naval blockade of Germany.
 Although the strategy, which involved the interruption of vital military and civilian supplies, was successful, it violated generally recognized international law and was contemplated in several international agreements of the past two centuries.
 Britain extracted international waters in sectors of the ocean to block the entry of ships, even putting neutral ships at risk.
 Having received a reduced response to this tactic, Germany thought it would encounter a similar reaction to its unrestricted submarine warfare.
 Throughout the 1920s, the attitude of most citizens and nations was one of pacifism and isolation.
 After seeing the horrors and atrocities of World War I, countries wanted to avoid such a situation happening again in the future.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States to take a job at Edison's company in New York.
 He arrived in the U S. with 4 cents, a book of poems, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor,
 The old Chinese had a unique way of delimiting the different periods of time, each dynasty or each family in power constituted a different dynasty.
 Between each dynasty, there was also a period of instability, with provinces divided. The most famous was the Three Kingdoms period, which lasted for 60 years, between the Han and the Jin dynasties.
 During these stages, a bloody war erupted between many nobles who were vying for the throne.
 One of the most bloody periods in the history of ancient China was the Three Kingdoms period, where thousands of people died in a struggle to occupy the throne of the great Palace in Xi'An.
 There are many political and social consequences, such as the use of the metric system, the shift from absolutism to republicanism, nationalism, and the belief that the country belongs to the people, not to a single sovereign.
 And after the revolution, the posts were open to all male candidates, which allowed the most ambitious and prestigious to succeed.
 The same is true of the military, for instead of basing the Army on classes,
 The French Revolution also inspired many other people of the repressed working class in other countries to take up arms and fight for their own revolutions.
 Mahomet was deeply interested in questions beyond this worldly life, and used to visit a cave which became known as Hira, in the mountain of Noor,
 The cave itself, which has endured in time, illustrates very realistically the spiritual inclinations of Muhammad.
 At the summit of one of the mountains north of Mecca, lies a cave totally unconnected with the rest of the planet.
 Indeed, it is very difficult to find, even if one is sure of its existence,
 Nothing can be seen or heard from within this cave, except the marvelous clear sky and the numerous mountains in the vicinity.
 Of the seven wonders, the only one that still stands is the great pyramid of Giza.
 The great pyramid, built by the Egyptian people in the third century BC, is one of many structures of this shape and size built to venerate a dead pharaoh.
 The great majority of Hong Kong Island's urban development is densely packed on reclaimed land along the northern shore.
 The great pyramid was built in honor of the pharaoh Khufu, and many other smaller ones, tombs and temples, were built in honor of his wives and family.
 The inspector general, D.K. Arya, said, we have arrested five persons who raped the Swiss woman and recovered her mobile and laptop.
 Arrow means to begin at the point and push the bow, and down means to begin at the heel, where the hand holds the bow, and to pull it.
 The upward movement of the arc generates a softer sound, whereas a downward movement is louder and sharper.
 Feel free to make your own marks with pencil, but please remember that the marks on the bow instruments have been impressed in that place for a musical purpose, and therefore should be respected.
 On October 6, 1789, a mob of market women forced the terrified monarch, Louis XVI, to return to Paris from Versailles,
 They traveled back to Paris in a carriage surrounded by a mob shouting and throwing threats at the King and the queen.
 The crowd forced the King and the queen to open all the windows of their carriage.
 At one point, a participant in the revolt shook the head of a Royal guard who had been executed in Versailles in front of the queen, who was in a state of panic.
 The Filipino people themselves paid the costs of the U S. imperialism in conquering the Philippines.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U S . colonial regime with the purpose of paying off most of the bonds' principal and interest that fluctuated in the name of the Philippine government in Wall Street banks.
 And the super profits derived from the prolonged exploitation of the Filipino people would constitute the principal gains of American imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, it is necessary to understand the context in which they were founded.
 The period of European history in which these events took place is commonly known as the High Middle Ages, between the eleventh, twelfth, and thirteenth centuries.
 The early Middle Ages were preceded by the Early Middle Ages and followed by the Late Middle Ages, which conventionally ends around the year 1500.
 Technological determinism is a concept that encompasses, pragmatically, a wide range of ideas, from the impulse or technological imperative to a strict sense of there being a underlying logic that drives the destiny of humanity and that relates to the laws of science and how they are embodied in technology.
 Almost all interpretations of technological determinism have in common two general ideas: that technological development in itself unfolds by a path independent of any cultural or political influence, and that at the same time, technology has effects on societies that are inherent and not socially conditioned.
 For example, one might argue that the existence of automobiles necessarily leads to the development of roads.
 However, a national road system is not viable economically for a small volume of cars, and so new manufacturing techniques are being designed to reduce the costs of owning a vehicle.
 The massive use of automobiles also generates a greater incidence of traffic accidents, which leads to the development of new techniques in the field of health to repair the damaged bodies.
 The element of cultural determinism was very much present in the romanticism, according to scholars like Goethe, Fichte, and Schlegel.
 In the context of Romanticism, geography shaped people, and, with the passage of time, customs and cultures developed that were in harmony with the location of that society,
 As well as Paris being known as the fashion capital of the world today, Constantinople was considered as such in feudal Europe.
 His fame as a center of luxury began approximately in 400 BC and extended until approximately 1100 BC.
 During the twelfth century, however, their status declined, partly because, on their return, the crusaders brought back gifts such as silks and spices, which were given greater value than the goods offered in Byzantine markets.
 The title of fashion capital was transferred from Constantinople to Paris.
 The peak of the Gothic style took place in the period between the tenth and eleventh centuries, and the fourteenth.
 At first, the way of dressing received great influence from Byzantine culture in the east.
 However, due to the slowness of communication channels, Western styles could be delayed by as much as 25 to 30 years.
 Towards the end of the Middle Ages, Western Europe began to develop its own style. One of the most significant advances of that era was that, as a result of the Crusades, people began to use buttons to fasten their garments.
 Subsistence agriculture is the practice of producing just enough food to feed the farmer and his or her family.
 Organic farming is a simple, generally organic, practice that combines the use of regionally originated seed stocks with crop rotation or other comparatively simple methods to maximize production.
 Historically, a large part of the farmers' principal activity was subsistence agriculture, which is still practiced in many developing countries.
 Subcultures congregate individuals with similar ideas and feelings of marginalization by social standards and gives them the possibility of generating a sense of identity.
 There are many factors that can distinguish subcultures: age, ethnicity, class, location, or gender of their members.
 The features that distinguish a subculture may be linguistic, aesthetic, sexual, geographic, or related to religion, politics, or a mixture of factors.
 It is common for members of a subculture to exhibit traits of their belonging to it by recurring to distinctive and symbolic use of style, such as fashions, gestures, and jargon.
 One of the most commonly used mechanisms to graph the importance of socialization is to analyze the few and lamentable cases of children who, by neglect, misfortune or intentional abuse, were not socialized by adults during their growth.
 Some of these children are confined by people, generally their parents, in some cases, the abandonment of a child is due to the parents' rejection of the child's severe intellectual or physical disability.
 It is possible that the orphaned children suffered traumatic situations or severe childhood abuse before they were abandoned or ran away.
 Some have been raised by animals, and some have lived on their own in the wild.
 When the wild child is raised exclusively by animals other than humans, he or she displays almost identical behavior to that of the specific animal that raised him or her, as well as a fear or indifference to humans.
 Even though project-based learning should facilitate this process and make it more interesting, the scaffolding goes a little bit further.
 The scaffolding is not a technique of learning, it is, rather, a support that provides assistance to those who are experiencing a new experience, such as using a new computer program or starting a new project.
 The scaffolding can be in real or virtual form, to say it another way, a teacher is a type of scaffolding, but so is the animated little paper clip in Microsoft office.
 Virtual scaffolds are embedded in the software and their function is to question, stimulate, or explain procedures that may have been complex for the student to do on his or her own.
 It is used to house children for a wide variety of reasons, from neglect to abuse and even extortion.
 No child should ever have to grow up in an environment where there is no love, care and education.
 We can see that the foster care system provides a safe environment for these children.
 The goal of our foster care system is to provide safe homes, loving foster parents, sustained education, and reliable medical care.
 The goal of foster care is to meet all the needs that were not being met in the child's home prior to being placed in foster care.
 The Internet unites and mixes components of mass communication and between people.
 The various features of the Internet open up new dimensions from the perspective of the concept of uses and rewards.
 For example, learning and socialization are cited as significant incentives for Internet use.
 During a study of user reactions to Websites conducted by Eighmey and McCord (1998), personal participation and durable relationships were also detected as new motivational factors.
 Through the recording of videos, important findings have been made in the interpretation of micro expressions, which are movements in the face of only a few milliseconds.
 Specifically, it is argued that by adequately reading their micro expressions, it is possible to detect if a person is lying.
 During the 1980s, he worked on shows such as Taxi, Cheers, and The Tracy Ullman Show.
 Even suggests that the ability to interpret human behaviour may be shared with animals, such as domestic dogs.
 Throughout the twentieth century, research has shown that there are two groups of genetic variation, hidden and manifest.
 The process of mutation incorporates a new genetic variation, while the process of selection removes it from the set of variations.
 Segregation and recombination shuffle the variation from one generation to the next.
 On the savannah, it is not easy for a primate, whose digestive system is the same as ours, to satisfy its amino acid needs from the vegetable resources available.
 More than that, not doing it causes serious problems: slowed growth, malnutrition and, ultimately, death.
 Proteins present in leaves and legumes would have been the most readily available source of vegetable protein, but they are not easily digested by primates like us, except when cooked.
 On the other hand, foods derived from animals, such as ants, termites, and eggs, are easy to digest while providing a large number of proteins that contain all the essential amino acids.
 In conclusion, it should not surprise us if our own predecessors solved their own protein problems in the same way as the Sabine chimpanzees do today.
 The interruption of sleep consists in waking up intentionally during the normal period of sleep and then falling asleep again after a short period of time.
 This can be easily accomplished with a more or less gentle alarm clock that will cause him to wake up again, though not completely.
 The registration is an additional requirement for the visa process. In some countries, you will have to register your presence and the address of your accommodation with the local authorities.
 Other options based on biological rhythm consist in drinking a lot of liquid, especially water or tea, known as a diuretic, before going to bed, which will force him to get up and urinate.
 The level of inner peace a person enjoys is related inversely to the amount of tension in his or her body and in his or her spirit.
 The lower the tension, the more positive the life force with which we are all endowed.
 We all can achieve enlightenment, the only thing that hinders the way is our tension and negativity.
 Although the foundations of Tibetan Buddhism are the teachings of the Buddha, it has extended through the Mahayana path of love and numerous yoga techniques from India.
 In general, Laism is very simple, based on Kundalini yoga, meditation, and the path of love that encompasses all.
 In Kundalini yoga, the Kundalini energy is activated through yoga postures, breathing practices, Mantras, or visualizations.
 Tibetan meditation focuses on the Deva Yoga, through the visualization of different deities, can unblock the energy channels, activate the chakras, and develop the consciousness of enlightenment.
 Cooperation between the USSR and the USA was the result of facing a common enemy, Germany, during World War II. After the war, systemic, process and cultural clashes ended up distancing the two countries.
 Two years after the end of the war, the allies were now enemies, and the cold war began.
 It would extend for the next 40 years and would be fought, in a way, through proxy wars, in battlefields from Africa to Asia, in Afghanistan, Cuba, among many other places.
 By September 17, 1939, Polish defense was already broken, and their only hope was to retreat and reorganize in the extension of the Romanian bridgehead.
 Despite these plans, however, the Soviet Army entered and formed the Belorussian and Ukrainian fronts after invading the Eastern regions of Poland, infringing the Treaty of Riga, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact, and other bilateral and multilateral agreements.
 Using ships to transport goods is a much more efficient way to transport large numbers of people and goods across the oceans.
 The function of the Navy has always been to ensure that its country retains the ability to move its people and goods, while interfering with the enemy's ability to do the same.
 The North Atlantic campaign during World War II offers one of the clearest and most recent examples of this.
 At the same time, the German Navy, using mainly submarines, attempted to nullify this circulation.
 If the Allies had not succeeded, Germany could have taken over Britain, as it had done with the other European countries.
 Apparently, goats were first domesticated about 10,000 years ago in the Zagros mountains of Iran.
 In order to obtain their milk, hair, meat and skin, the ancient peoples and tribes began to keep them.
 Generally, the domestic goats were gathered into herds that wandered over the hills or other grazing areas, often cared for by shepherds of goats who were usually children or teenagers, similar to the more popular shepherd.
 In England, railways had been installed by the sixteenth century.
 Even though the rails of the cars were made of simple parallel boards of wood, they allowed the horses that pulled them to go faster and to haul heavier loads than on the day's somewhat rougher roads.
 The incorporation of ties to keep the rails in place occurred quite early, but it was gradually realized that the rails would be more efficient if they were lined with iron on the top.
 This became a common practice, although the iron caused greater wear on the wooden wheels of the cars.
 Eventually, wooden wheels were replaced with iron ones, and in 1767, solid iron rails began to be used.
 The first form of transportation that we know of was walking. Humans began to do it upright two million years ago with the appearance of Homo Erectus.
 Their predecessors, the Australopithecus, did not have the habit of walking erect.
 Although bipedalism has been found in Australopithecus fossils dating from 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago, it is possible that Sahelanthropus walked on two legs as early as 7 million years ago.
 We can start to live a more planet-friendly life, join environmental movements, or even become activists and fight to lessen the future suffering.
 In many cases, it's like the symptomatic treatment, but if we're not looking only at a temporary situation, we should be looking at the root of the problems and trying to deactivate them.
 It is manifest that the world has undergone great changes, product of the technological and scientific advances of humanity, and the problems have intensified because of overpopulation and the extravagant lifestyle of people.
 After it was approved by the Congress on July 4, a handwritten and signed draft of the Declaration was sent by the President of the Congress, John Hancock, and the Secretary, Charles Thomson, to the printing press of John Dunlap, a few blocks away.
 During the night, between one hundred and fifty, and two hundred, copies were made, which are now known as the Dunlap copies.
 John Nixon was the first to read it, and he did so in the courtyard of the Independence hall on July 8.
 On July 6, a copy was sent to George Washington, who ordered it to be read to his Army in New York on July 9.
 Dunlap's 25 photographs, which are known to still exist, are the oldest copies of the document.
 A large number of paleontologists believe that a group of dinosaurs survived and are alive today,
 Many people don't picture dinosaurs as having feathers and being able to fly.
 However, there are many characteristics in birds that still resemble dinosaurs.
 They have scaly, clawed extremities, lay eggs, and move on their hind legs like the T-Rex.
 Currently, almost all computers work on the basis of manipulating data Encoded under the Binary system.
 A Binary number can only have one of two values, they are the 0 and the 1, and according to computer jargon, these numbers are known as Binary digits, or bits.
 Internal poisoning may not be evident at once, and symptoms like vomiting are too common to be able to make an immediate diagnosis.
 The most obvious indicator of internal poisoning may be found in an open bottle of toxic chemicals.
 Read the label for specific first aid information about the specific poison.
 Entomologists use the term parasitic insect in a formal sense to refer to this group of arthropods.
 The word comes from its ancient relation to bedbugs, a species that evolved to parasitize humans.
 Bedbugs and the Cimex lectularius are nest-building insects,
 The cases of multiple sclerosis in the United States of America are estimated to be around 400,000, making it the most common neurological disease among young and middle-aged adults.
 The central nervous system, the union of the brain, spinal cord, and optic nerve, is the target of multiple sclerosis.
 Studies have indicated that women are twice as likely as men to suffer from MS.
 A couple might conclude that raising a baby would not be the most convenient thing for them or for the child.
 These couples could choose to plan the adoption of a baby.
 In an adoption, the biological parents relinquish their parental rights so that a different couple can raise the child.
 The goal of science is to decipher the way in which the world works through the scientific method, which serves as a guide to most of the scientific investigations.
 It's not, however, an experiment, it's a test that is used to rule out one or more of the possible hypotheses by asking questions and making observations that guide scientific inquiry.
 The focus of both naturalists and philosophers was on the classical works, especially the Latin version of the Biblical text.
 The thoughts of Aristotle, especially the questions of science, even psychology, were accepted.
 As the Greek language declined, Western Europe distanced itself from its Greek philosophical and scientific roots.
 Often, many rhythms present in physiological and behavioral processes depend decisively on internal cycles and their production through biological clocks.
 Periodic rhythms, which are not only reactions to regular external stimuli, have been recorded in almost all living things, even in bacteria, fungi, plants, and animals.
 Biological clocks oscillate autonomously and have a cyclical free-running period, even if there are no external stimuli.
 One of the key indicators that DNA was a genetic material was the experiment conducted by Hershey and Chase.
 Hershey and Chase inserted their own DNA into a bacterium using phage, or viruses.
 They performed two experiments in which they tagged the phage DNA with radioactive phosphorus or the DNA protein with radioactive sulfur.
 Depending on the type of mutation, the significance of the affected piece of genetic material and whether it involves germ cells, the mutation can have various effects.
 Only mutations in germ cells can be passed on to children, while those that occur in other parts of the body can cause cell death or cancer.
 Nature-based tourism usually attracts people interested in visiting natural areas to enjoy the scenery, which includes wildlife,
 Some examples of possible activities in the area are: hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, and visiting parks, and studying information about the ecosystem.
 An example is to visit, take photographs and learn about orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning, people leave small towns in their cars to go to work, and they often cross paths with others whose jobs are in the same place they have just left.
 In this dynamic transfer shuttle, everyone is in some way connected to a system of transportation based on the use of private automobiles, and they sustain it.
 Currently, scientists argue that this massive carbon economy has deprived the biosphere of one of its regular states that has contributed to the evolution of humanity over the last two million years.
 Everyone is part of the society and uses the transportation systems, and almost everyone complains about them.
 In developed countries, it is rare to hear such levels of complaint about the quality of water or the collapse of bridges.
 The reason for the complaints and the reason for the failures are not simply that the engineers are incompetent.
 The flow of traffic is the study of the individual movement of drivers and vehicles between two points and of the interactions between them.
 Unfortunately, it is not easy to study the flow of traffic, since it is not possible to make exact predictions about the behavior of drivers.
 Fortunately, there is a tendency in drivers to maintain a relatively consistent behavior, which allows the traffic flows to have a logical consistency and can be the subject of approximate mathematical representation.
 In order to graphically illustrate the flow of circulation, relationships were established between the three most important elements: (1) flow, (2) density, and (3) velocity.
 These relationships facilitate both planning and design as well as the operations of the vials.
 The first creatures to take to the air were insects, which helped them to escape their enemies more easily and to find food and mates more effectively.
 Most insects have the advantage of being able to fold their wings back, and stick them to the sides of their bodies.
 This gives them a wider range of small places to hide from predators.
 At present, the Anisoptera and Ephemeroptera are the only insects incapable of folding their wings.
 Millennia ago, a man named Aristarchus commented that the solar system rotated around the sun.
 There were those who shared his theory, but many others believed the opposite, that the solar system was orbiting the earth, even the sun and other stars.
 This seems to make sense, since on the earth, we don't perceive its movement, right?
 The Amazon River is the largest by volume and the second largest by length, containing 8 times more water than the next largest river.
 The Amazon is also the widest river in the world, with some parts of its width reaching up to six miles.
 Of the total water from the world's rivers that flows into the oceans, 20% comes from the Amazon.
 The great Amazon River is 6,387 kilometers long and receives water from thousands of smaller rivers.
 Although the pyramids of stone continued to be built until the end of the Old Kingdom, never could they surpass those of Guiza, neither in size nor in the sublime technique of their construction.
 The ancient Egyptians of the New Kingdom were amazed at the monuments of their forefathers, which at that time dated back more than a thousand years.
 With approximately 800 inhabitants, the Vatican City is the smallest independent country in the world and the one with the smallest population.
 The Italian language is used in the Vatican City, both for drafting its legislation and for issuing its official communications.
 The language spoken daily by the majority of those who work within the state is also Italian, and the use of Latin is generally reserved for religious ceremonies.
 The total number of citizens living in Vatican City adhere to the Roman Catholic religion.
 The basic chemicals, gold, silver, and copper, have been known since antiquity, as they can all be found in their original form in nature and are relatively easy to extract with rudimentary tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle developed the theory that everything is made up of a combination of one or more of four elements: earth, water, air, and fire.
 It was akin to the states of matter, solid, liquid, gaseous, and plasma, only that at the same time it had the theory of how they are transformed into new substances that make up the things we see.
 Alloys are basically a combination of two or more metals, and remember, the periodic table has many elements.
 Metals are considered to be elements like calcium and potassium, and there are also metals like gold and silver.
 It is also possible that alloys with small amounts of elements, such as carbon, which are not metallic, may also be present.
 Everything in the universe is made of matter, which is composed of tiny particles called atoms.
 The size of atoms is so immeasurably small that the end of this sentence could contain billions of them.
 And so, when it was invented, the pencil won many friends.
 Unfortunately, as a result of the new writing methods, the pencil is used less and has lost its status.
 Nowadays, people write messages on the screens of their computers, they don't even need to approach a typewriter.
 And what's left of the keyboard will be there for the next new thing.
 The atomic bomb works on the principle that it takes energy to make a nucleus with a lot of protons and neutrons.
 It's similar to what happens when you roll a heavy car up a hill and split the core once more, it releases some of that energy.
 The nuclei of some atoms are unstable, meaning that they tend to decay with a minimum or almost no push.
 The surface of the moon is made up of rocks and dust, and its outer layer is called the crust.
 The crust is about 70 kilometers thick on the near side and about 100 kilometers thick on the far side.
 It is thinner under the lunar seas and thicker under the highlands.
 It is possible that there are more seas on the near side due to its thinner crust, which allowed the lava to rise to the surface.
 Theories of content focus on what it is that attracts or pleases people.
 These doctrines hold that people have certain needs or desires that have been internalized as they grew up to maturity.
 These theories analyze what it is that causes certain people to want the things they do and what factors in their environment cause them to do or not do certain things.
 Two of the most well-known are Maslow's hierarchy of needs and Hertzberg's two-factor theory.
 In general, there are two types of behavior when managers begin to lead their former colleagues. On one side of the spectrum is the attempt to continue being one of the guys.
 It's hard for managers of this category to make tough decisions that go against the grain of the employees, to impose disciplinary measures, to evaluate performance, to assign responsibilities, and to hold people accountable.
 At the other end of the spectrum, it mutates into an unrecognizable person who believes it necessary to change everything that the group has been doing up to that point and to do it in his or her own way.
 Ultimately, the leader is the one responsible for the team's success and failure.
 This way of acting often ends up distancing the leaders from the rest of the team.
 The same standards of excellence that are used for conventional teams apply to virtual teams, although there are some small differences.
 Often, virtual team members act as a point of contact for their closest physical team.
 They generally enjoy greater autonomy than the members of a traditional group, thanks to the fact that it is possible for their teams to meet according to different time zones, which, for example, might not be understood by the local management.
 The existence of an invisible team, or a real invisible team,
 The invisible team is the group in charge of the management and to which each member reports.
 What motive would an organization have for going through the somewhat demanding process of establishing a learning organization?
 When all the resources available are used in a proper way in the operational departments of an organization, it generates room for creativity and ingenuity.
 Product of this, it is possible that the process of a team working together to overcome a difficulty of place leads to a new innovative process in order to meet the needs of the customers.
 For an organization to be innovative, leadership must first create a culture of innovation, along with a shared knowledge and organizational learning.
 Angel (2006) explains the continuous approach as a method used to help organizations achieve a higher level of performance.
 Neurobiological data offer factual evidence for a theoretical approach to the investigation of cognition, thereby narrowing the field of investigation and giving it greater accuracy.
 The correlation between brain pathology and behavior contributes to the research of scientists.
 For a long time it has been known that various types of brain damage, trauma, injury and tumours affect behaviour and cause changes in mental function.
 Thanks to the new technologies, we have the possibility of seeing and investigating structures and processes in the brain that were never seen before.
 This gives us ample information and material to develop simulation models, which enhance our understanding of mental processes.
 Although it is often associated with science fiction, it is a specialty within computer science that deals with the behavior, learning, and intelligent adaptation of a machine.
 Research in the field of ai involves the development of machines to automate tasks that require intelligent behaviour.
 Examples of this are, among others, monitoring, planning and scheduling, the ability to respond to customer diagnoses and queries, as well as facial, handwriting and voice recognition.
 These issues have become separate disciplines, focused on offering solutions to real-life problems.
 Artificial intelligence is now often used in the fields of economics, medicine, engineering, and the military, as well as being incorporated into various applications of video games and personal computers.
 Study trips are an important part of every classroom. It is very common for a teacher to want to take her or his students to places that are not accessible by bus.
 The solution comes from technology, through virtual tours, where students can observe objects in a museum, visit an aquarium, or contemplate beautiful works of art, all from the comfort of their classroom.
 Sharing a virtual field trip is also an excellent way to reflect on a field trip and share experiences with future classes.
 For example, every year, the Bennet school in North Carolina designs a Web page about their trip to the state capital, and every year the page is updated, but the previous versions are kept Online as a kind of scrapbook.
 Blogs can also contribute to improving students' writing skills, although students often begin their Blogging experience with poor grammar and spelling.
 Because students are often the most critical readers, the Blog writer begins to strive for better writing, in order to avoid criticism.
 Blogging also requires that students be more comprehensive of the world around them.
 Blogs are a resource that inspires collaboration and encourages students to go beyond the typical school day.
 The proper use of Blogs can empower students to be more analytical and critical, through active response to Internet content, they can define their own positions in the context of others' writings, in addition to establishing their perspectives on specific topics.
 Ottawa is the bilingual capital of Canada and has a variety of museums and art galleries that display the country's history and current events.
 Niagara falls are to the south, and the northern part of the province is home to the unspoiled natural beauty of Muskoka and the area beyond.
 All of these aspects, among others, are what make Ontario seem intrinsically Canadian to the eyes of outsiders.
 The larger areas to the North are sparsely populated, and some are wilderness, almost uninhabited.
 In the United States, there are more African-Americans than there are Canadians.
 The location of the East African Islands is off the coast of East Africa, in the Indian Ocean.
 Madagascar is by far the largest and a continent unto itself if we're talking about wildlife.
 The largest of these is the island of Corsica, which is a region of France.
 Islam was also brought to the Islands by the Arabs and, to a large extent, it has been imposed in the Comoros and Mayotte.
 The initial point of European influence and colonialism took place in the fifteenth century, following the discovery by the Portuguese explorer, Vasco da Gama, of the route linking Europe with India.
 It borders the Sahel to the North, and the Atlantic Ocean to the South and West.
 Women: It is advised that all female visitors say they are married, regardless of their actual marital status.
 It will also be useful to use a ring (but make sure it doesn't look too expensive).
 Women should be aware that cultural differences can cause what they consider to be harassment, and that it is not uncommon for women to be followed, touched, or grabbed by the arm.
 Be firm in rejecting men and do not hesitate to defend your position, regardless of whether there are cultural differences or not.
 The founders of the modern city of Casablanca were the Berber fishermen during the tenth century BC and the Phoenicians, Romans, and Byzantines used it as a strategic port, called Anfa.
 It was destroyed and rebuilt by the Portuguese with the name of Casa Branca, but in 1755 it was abandoned after a terrible earthquake.
 The city was rebuilt by order of the Moroccan Sultan with the name Daru l-Badya and the Spanish traders who had settled there called it Casablanca.
 Casablanca is one of the most boring places in all of Morocco for shopping.
 In the outskirts of the old Medina, there are plenty of places where traditional Moroccan items are sold, such as earthenware, ceramics, leather goods, water pipes and a whole range of other trinkets, although all of it is geared towards tourists.
 Goma is a tourist destination in the Democratic Republic of the Congo, on the eastern border, near Rwanda.
 In 2002, the Nyiragongo volcano destroyed Goma and left much of its streets underwater, especially in the city's center.
 Although Goma is quite safe, any visit to the outside should be considered in order to take account of the situation of the confrontations that persist in the province of North Kivu.
 In turn, the city is the base for scaling Nyiragongo volcano and its gorilla trekking excursions are some of the cheapest in Africa.
 To get around Goma, you can take a boda-boda, which is a motorcycle taxi. The regular fare is CDF500 for a short ride.
 Added to this is the fact that it is relatively inaccessible, and has given Tombuctoo an image of exotic and remote land.
 Although today, Timbuktu is a poor city, it still has an airport and its reputation makes it a tourist attraction.
 In 1990, it was added to the list of world heritage sites in danger, because of the threat of desert sand.
 It was one of the stops on Henry Louis Gates's special, Wonders of the African world, on PBS.
 The city contrasts much with the rest of the country, as it possesses a more Arabic than African style.
 The Kruger National Park is located in northeastern South Africa and extends along the border with Mozambique to the east, Zimbabwe to the north and the Crocodile River to the south.
 The park has an area of 19,500 km2 and is divided into 14 distinct ecozones, each of which has a different wildlife.
 This is one of the most important attractions in South Africa and is recognized as the main icon of South Africa's National Parks.
 As in all of South Africa's nature reserves, there are daily conservation and access fees to the park.
 It may also be convenient to purchase a Wild Card which allows entry to selected parks in South Africa or to all the National parks in the country.
 The territory of Hong Kong takes its name from the homonymous island, which is the destination of most tourists.
 The deployment of buildings that delimit the horizon of Hong Kong has been compared to a graphic of light bars that is evidenced by the presence of the Victoria Harbour.
 The best way to enjoy the best views of Hong Kong is to get out of the island and head to the Kowloon waterfront.
 It is in the reclaimed lands of the North Coast of Hong Kong where it is densely concentrated.
 This is the site that the British conquerors adopted as their own, so if you're looking for evidence of the colonial past of this region, it's a convenient place to start.
 The Sundarbans are the world's largest contiguous mangrove forest, with a length of 80 km from the coast of Bangladesh and India.
 The UNESCO has declared the Sundarbans a world heritage site, and the section of the forest within the Indian territory is called Sundarbans National Park.
 And yet, despite this, the forests are not just Mangroves, but also contain some of the last remaining trees from the once impenetrable jungles that once covered the Gangetic plain.
 The Sundarbans comprise an area of 3,850 square kilometres and nearly a third of its area is covered by water or swampy areas.
 Since 1966, the Sundarbans have been a temple of wildlife and it is estimated that there are now 400 Bengal tigers and some 30,000 spotted deer in the area.
 Buses leave the inter-district station (on the other side of the river) throughout the day, although most, especially those going east and to Jakar (also spelled Bumthang), leave between 6:30 and 7:30 a.m.
 Due to the fact that buses between districts are often crowded, it is recommended to purchase a ticket with a few days of anticipation.
 Almost all districts have the service of Japanese Coaster buses, which are comfortable and durable.
 Sharing a taxi is a quick and convenient way to get to nearby places, such as Paro (150 ngultrums) and Punakha (200 ngultrums).
 The Oyapock bridge is a suspension bridge that crosses the Oyapock River, connecting Oiapoque, Brazil, and Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock, French Guiana.
 The two towers reach a height of 83 m, with a length of 378 m and two tracks of 3.5 m wide.
 Below the bridge is a 15-meter-wide space, and although its construction was finished in August 2011, it was not opened to traffic until March 2017.
 The full functioning of the bridge is estimated to be September 2017, which is when Brazilian customs controls are expected to be finished.
 The area that is now Eastern Paraguay was inhabited by the Guaraní, who were the most important indigenous group in the region, and who lived as hunter-gatherers, as well as practicing subsistence agriculture.
 The Chaco region also hosted other aboriginal groups, for example, the Guaycurú and Payaguá, who hunted, gathered and fished as a means of subsistence.
 Paraguay, formerly known as the «Gigantic province of the Indies», was born in the sixteenth century, as a result of the encounter between the Spanish conquerors and the indigenous peoples.
 The Spanish started the colonization stage, which lasted for three centuries.
 Since Asuncion was founded in 1537, Paraguay has been able to preserve much of its aboriginal idiosyncrasy and identity.
 Argentina is famous for having one of the best polo teams and players in the world.
 The most important tournament of the year takes place in December at the polo fields of Las Cañitas.
 There are also other tournaments and lower-level matches held at other times of the year.
 You can find out more about the Argentine polo Association and where to buy tickets for polo matches at the Argentine polo Association Website.
 The Falkland Islands pound, the official currency of the Falkland Islands, is pegged to the British pound sterling.
 There is a single bank in the Islands, where you can change your money. It is opposite the FIC West shop in Stanley.
 Pounds sterling are usually accepted anywhere within the Islands, and in Stanley, you can also pay with credit cards or U S. dollars.
 There are chances that in the outer Islands, credit cards may not be accepted, but you could use British or American money.
 It is practically impossible to change money outside the Falkland Islands, so make sure you do it before you leave.
 Because Montevideo is located south of Ecuador, it is summer there when in the northern hemisphere it is winter, and vice versa.
 Montevideo is located in the subtropics, with frequent temperatures above 30° C during the summer.
 The cold winters can be deceptive: although it is very rare for temperatures to fall below freezing, the wind and humidity interact to make it feel colder than the thermometer indicates.
 There are no specifically rainy or dry seasons, the amount of rain is almost the same throughout the year.
 Although many of the park's animals are used to seeing people, wildlife is still wild, and should not be fed or disturbed.
 According to the park's guidelines, you must stay at least 100 yards away from bears and wolves, and 25 yards away from the rest of the wild animals.
 Despite how docile they may appear, bison, uapatíes, moose, bears, and practically all large animals can be aggressive.
 Dozens of visitors suffer injuries every year from not maintaining an adequate distance.
 Also, remember that odors attract bears and other wild animals, so be sure to avoid having or cooking foods that give off a lot of aroma and keep the camp clean.
 The capital of Samoa, the city of Apia, is located on the island of Upolu and has just under 40,000 inhabitants.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the capital of Samoa since 1959.
 In 1889, the port was the scene of a nefarious naval confrontation when seven German, American, and English ships refused to leave the port.
 They sunk all but one British cruiser, killing nearly two hundred Americans and Germans.
 During the Mau movement's war for independence, a peaceful encounter in the city resulted in the assassination of the state leader, Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 There are a number of beaches, as Auckland has two harbours, the most well-known being in three areas.
 In the North Harbour district, on the Pacific Ocean, are the beaches of North Shore, which stretch from Long Bay in the North to Devonport in the South.
 The beaches are almost all sandy with safe places to swim and mostly have Pohutukawa trees which provide shade.
 In the Waitemata Harbour, Tamaki Drive beaches are on the central region of Auckland, in the extravagant suburbs of Mission Bay and St Heliers.
 These are family beaches, sometimes very crowded, with numerous and varied shops available on the thing.
 Number one is the most popular local beer, and it's not complex, but rather pleasant and refreshing.
 Although there are many different French wines, New Zealand and Australian wines could be considered better for transport.
 The local tap water is completely safe to drink, but if you're worried, you can easily find bottled water.
 Australians consider the notion of a plain white coffee to be foreign, a small black coffee is called an espresso, cappuccino is served with cream, not foam, and tea is not served with milk.
 The hot chocolate is up to Belgian standards, and the fruit juices are expensive but delicious.
 There are numerous trips to the reef all year round, and here, injuries from any of these causes are rare.
 In any case, accept the advice of the authorities, respect all the signs and pay special attention to the safety warnings.
 Cubomedusae are found near beaches and river estuaries from October to April, north of 1770, although they can be found outside this period.
 Sharks do exist, but they almost never attack humans, and most of them are afraid of us and would swim away.
 The ocean is not the primary habitat for saltwater crocodiles, whose primary habitat is the estuaries of the rivers that flow north of Rockhampton.
 The reservation of lodging in advance of the trip gives you the peace of mind that you will have a place to sleep when you arrive at your destination.
 The travel agents usually have agreements with specific hotels, although through them it is also possible to book other types of accommodation, such as camping areas.
 Travel agents typically offer packages that include breakfast, transfers to and from the airport, and even combined flight and accommodation packages.
 They may also hold it in reserve in case you need time to think better about the offer, or to obtain other documents for your destination, such as a visa.
 However, any modification or request must be made through the travel agent first, and not directly through the hotel.
 At some festivals, the majority of those who attend the musical events decide to camp out in the place and the majority of the spectators consider it a crucial aspect of the experience.
 If you want to see the action close up, then you'll need to arrive early at the campground to get a good spot near the musical events.
 While the musical performances may have ended, in other areas of the festival, they could continue until the early hours of the morning.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with small children.
 If you are crossing the North Sea in winter, check where the cabin is located, as the noise from the ice will be very disturbing to those most affected.
 During the cruises to St . Petersburg, you also spend time in the city. You are exempted from the visa requirements if you disembark.
 Normally, casinos make great efforts to maximize the time and money that their customers spend.
 They tend to offer special deals on food, drink and entertainment in order to keep guests happy and within the premises.
 Some establishments serve free spirits although drunkenness affects judgment and all good players know the importance of keeping sober.
 Anyone who intends to drive in high altitudes or mountain passes should plan for the possibility of snow, ice, or low temperatures.
 On icy or snowy roads, there is little friction, so it is not possible to drive as you would on a bare asphalt road.
 During a snowstorm, it can fall so much snow that he will be trapped in a very short time.
 In addition, visibility may be reduced by snow, condensation, or ice that forms on the car's windows.
 In addition, the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center said there was no Tsunami indication.
 Safaris are probably the most popular tourist attraction in Africa and the most memorable part of the trip for many visitors.
 The popular use of the term safari refers to overland trips to see the surprising wildlife of Africa, particularly in the savanna.
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, will approach vehicles and standard equipment will make for a good view.
 Sometimes lions, cheetahs and leopards can be shy, so you'll have more chance of seeing them using binoculars.
 The safari known as a walking safari, also known as a bushwalk, bush trek, or a wilderness trek, is a form of hiking.
 The Paralympic games will take place between August 24 and September 5, 2021, with a number of events taking place in other parts of Japan.
 Host city of the 1964 Olympics, Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted two summer Olympics.
 If you booked your flights and accommodation for 2020 before the announcement of the postponement, it's possible that there may be complications.
 There are different types of travel insurance policies, but since the end of March, the coverage of most of these policies based on the Coronavirus,
 Most of the events are expected to cost between JPY 2,500 and JPY 130,000, with common passes costing JPY 7,000.
 Planing the clothes when they are still damp can help to dry them out. Many hotels have an iron and a board to lend to travellers, even if one is not in the room.
 If you don't have an ironing board, or if you don't want to use an ironed sheet, you can try with a hair dryer, if it's available.
 Be sure not to let the cloth get too hot, as it might shrink or, in extreme cases, burn.
 There are different methods of purifying water, some of which are more effective at tackling specific threats.
 In some places, it is enough to boil water for a minute, in others, it takes several more.
 Not all filters have the same effectiveness, and if this worries you, you should consider buying bottled water with a seal from a certified company.
 It may happen that travelers encounter plagues of animals which are not known in the regions from which they come.
 Pests are capable of ruining food, causing irritation or, in more serious cases, causing allergic reactions, spreading poison or transmitting infections.
 Infectious diseases, by themselves, or dangerous animals, which can injure or kill individuals by the use of their strength, are not usually included in the category of pests.
 The duty-free shop offers an opportunity to purchase, in certain places, tax-free goods.
 Travellers who visit countries with a high tax burden may, at times, save a significant amount of money, particularly on such goods as spirits and tobacco.
 On the Buffalo-Pittsburgh highway, the stretch between Point Marion and Fairmont is the most challenging in terms of driving conditions, and it frequently runs through remote and lonely terrain.
 If you do not usually drive on rural highways, stay alert: there are many steep grades, narrow lanes, and sharp curves.
 The speed limits are notoriously lower than in the preceding and following stretches, generally from 35 to 40 mph, and their strict compliance is even more important than in any other section.
 But the signal from cell phones is much better here than in many other sections of the Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German pastries are of good quality and in Bavaria, pastries are quite tasty and varied, similar to those made in Austria, their neighbor to the south.
 Common fruits are apple pies, with apples baked inside all year round, and cherries and plums that appear in the summer.
 Many of the German baked goods that are prepared in the oven also have almonds, hazelnuts and other nuts. In general, popular pastries make an excellent combination with a cup of strong coffee.
 If you're in the mood for small but tasty pastries, try the Berliner, also known as Pfannkuchen or Krapfen, depending on the region.
 The curry is a dish made of herbs and spices, and is served with meat or vegetables.
 We can find curry both in a dry and a wet form, depending on the amount of liquid.
 In the villages of northern India and Pakistan, yogurt is used in curry, while in the south of India and other coastal areas of the subcontinent, coconut milk is the usual.
 With 17,000 Islands to choose from, Indonesian cuisine is a generic term that encompasses a wide variety of regional cuisines that are distributed throughout the country.
 No, it's not alone, though, experimentation, and an experiment is a test that is used to eliminate one or more of the possible hypotheses, asking questions, and making observations also guide scientific research.
 The cuisine of Java, currently available throughout the archipelago, offers a variety of dishes seasoned with simple condiments, with predominance of the aromas preferred by the Javanese, such as peanuts, chili peppers, sugar, and various aromatic herbs.
 The clock is set to the local time, and it will be reset to the correct time when you get back.
 While providing greater stability to the rider, they can present safety issues, as it is possible for the rider's feet to become entangled in them.
 If a rider is thrown from the horse, but his foot is still caught in the stirrup, he can be dragged along if the animal runs.
 First, most riders wear boots with a heel that is thin and fairly narrow.
 In addition, there are saddles, especially English ones, with safety bars that allow the saddle to be pulled away from its structure if a rider who is thrown out pulls backward.
 The Cochamó Valley is the most popular destination for climbing in Chile and is known as the Yosemite of South America, with a variety of extensive granite walls and cliffs.
 The peaks also offer impactful views from the summits. Climbers from all corners of the globe constantly delineate new paths between their walls of potential infinity.
 Downhill winter sports, such as skiing and snowboarding, are popular disciplines that consist of sliding down a snowy surface with skis or a snowboard attached to the feet.
 Skiing is a major travel activity with many devotees, sometimes called ski bums, who organize their holidays completely around skiing at a specific site.
 The idea of skiing is very old, as there are cave paintings that represent skiers and date back to around 5,000 BC.
 As a discipline, alpine skiing dates from no later than the seventeenth century, and in 1861 the Norwegians inaugurated the first recreational ski club in Australia.
 Backpacker in skiing: also known as backcountry skiing, backcountry travel, or backcountry skiing.
 Although it is not generally associated with the practice of backcountry skiing or alpine-style mountaineering, developed on steep slopes with much more rigid ski and footwear.
 Imagine the ski slope as a hiking trail.
 In good conditions, you'll be able to cover a little bit more distance than if you were walking, but you'll rarely achieve the speed of cross-country skiing without a heavy pack on groomed trails.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but with many independent countries, and under normal circumstances, travelling through several countries would mean having to manage visa and passport controls several times.
 Nevertheless, the Schengen area functions as a single country in this regard.
 You can generally travel within this region without having to pass through a border control post.
 In the same way, by having a Schengen visa, it will not be necessary to apply for a visa to each of the Schengen countries separately.
 There is no universal criterion for determining when a manufactured item can be considered an antique.
 The definition varies geographically, where the age limit could be more narrowly defined in places like North America than in Europe.
 It may happen that handmade products are categorized as antiques, even though they are newer than similar mass-produced goods.
 Reindeer herding is a way of life for the Sami, and the culture related to this commercial activity is important for many who are engaged in other professions.
 Even so, traditionally, not all the Lapp people have been engaged in reindeer herding on a large scale, but have lived off fishing, hunting, and other similar activities, using reindeer mainly as draft animals.
 Today, many Laplanders work in modern commercial activities. Tourism is an important source of income in Lapland, the Sámi region.
 Although it is used extensively, especially among non-Romany people, the term Gypsy is often given a pejorative connotation,
 If your destination country is subject to a travel alert, it could affect your medical or cancellation insurance.
 It may be that he would like to consult the recommendations of other governments, but they are designed for their own citizens.
 For example, a North American visitor to the Middle East might face situations that are different from those of a European or an Arab.
 The travel warnings are just a concise summary of the political situation in another country.
 The views that are presented are usually superficial, generic, and oversimplified in comparison to the more detailed information available on other sites.
 The term severe weather refers, in general, to any hazardous climatic event that is capable of causing damage, serious social disruption, or death.
 The severe climate can occur anywhere on the planet and there are different types depending on geography, topography and atmospheric conditions.
 Hurricanes, avalanches, excessive rains and forest fires are types and consequences of extreme weather, as are lightning, tornadoes, water spouts, and cyclones.
 Among the extreme regional and seasonal climatic phenomena we find the winds, snowstorms, and hailstorms.
 It is strongly recommended that travellers inform themselves about any extreme weather risks in the area they are visiting, as this may affect their travel plans.
 Anyone who is planning a trip to a country that could be considered a war zone should receive professional training.
 It is likely that by searching for a course on hostile zones on the Internet, you will find the address of a local company.
 A course will normally cover all the topics that have been dealt with here in much greater detail and, in general, with practical experience.
 A typical course lasts between two and five days, and includes role-playing, first aid, and sometimes even weapons training.
 Books and magazines about survival in the wilderness are common, but publications about war zones are scarce.
 Passengers who have scheduled a sex change surgery in another country should make sure they have valid documentation for the return trip.
 The position of governments varies regarding the possibility of issuing passports without a gender declaration (X) or updated documents in order to make the name of the person coincide with the gender with which they identify.
 The disposition of foreign governments to honor these documents varies greatly.
 Inspections at security checkpoints have become more invasive since the September 11 attacks.
 Transgender people who have not yet had surgery should not be expected to pass through the scanners with their dignity and privacy intact.
 The return currents are the flow that recede from the breaking waves, often in a reef or similar.
 And because of the submarine topography, the return flow comes together in certain areas of greater depth, and there it can originate a fast current with direction to the deep waters.
 Most of the deaths occur from exhaustion, caused by trying to swim against the current, which is perhaps impossible.
 As soon as I escape from the current, swimming back will be no more difficult than usual.
 Make an attempt to get somewhere where you won't be seen again or, if you have the skills and someone has seen you, it might be best to wait for rescue.
 The impact of returning home occurs before the cultural one, it takes longer to fade and can be more difficult.
 Travelers who have found it easy to adapt to a new culture sometimes have great difficulty in returning to their native culture.
 When he returns home after living abroad, he will have adapted to the new culture and will have lost some of the habits of his native culture.
 When you first traveled abroad, the people were probably patient and understanding, as they knew travelers need time to adjust to a new country.
 People may not foresee that tolerance and understanding are also necessary for the returning travelers in their homes.
 The light show and the pyramid sound are one of the most interesting things for children in the area.
 In the darkness, you can see the pyramids and contemplate them in silence before the show begins.
 Generally, you'll hear the sound of tourists and vendors at all times, and the history of sound and light is like a book of short stories.
 The Sphinx appears as a background and narrator of a long history.
 The scenes are projected onto the pyramids, and all of them are illuminated.
 The discovery of the Shetland Islands occurred in 1819, and several nations claim them, with the largest number of bases, reaching sixteen active in 2020.
 The archipelago is located 120 km to the North of the peninsular territory. The largest island is King George, where the settlement of Villa Las Estrellas is located.
 Others include Livingston and Deception Island, where there is a spectacular natural harbour formed by the flooded caldera of an active volcano.
 The Ellsworth land, whose boundaries are defined by the Bellingshausen sea, is a region located to the South of the peninsula.
 Here, the Peninsula's mountains mingle with the plateau and then resurface to form the 360-kilometre-long Ellsworth range, which is bisected by the Minnesota glacier.
 In the northern sector, the Sentinel range, are the highest peaks of Antarctica, the Vinson massif, with a summit at 4,892 metres.
 In remote areas, where cell phone coverage is not available, a satellite phone could be their only option.
 A satellite phone cannot be equated to a mobile phone, because to make a call, one must be outdoors and have a clear line of sight to the satellite.
 The service is commonly used in water transport, including recreational craft, as well as for expeditions requiring remote data and voice.
 You can check with your local telephone service provider for more information on how to sign up for this service.
 Combining travel and learning has become a very popular option for those who plan to take a year off.
 This is very popular with high school graduates, as it allows them to take a year off before college without jeopardizing their education.
 In many cases, enrolling in a one-year study abroad program can, in fact, increase the chances of getting into higher education once one returns to the home country.
 There are usually fees charged for enrolling in these educational programs.
 Finland is an excellent destination for sailing: the land of a thousand lakes also has thousands of islands, both in the lakes and in the coastal archipelagos.
 A yacht is not always required in the archipelagoes and lakes.
 Although the coastal Islands and the larger lakes are large enough for any yacht, smaller craft or even a kayak provide a different experience.
 Boating is a recreational activity in Finland, with one boat for every seven or eight people.
 The same is true in Norway, Sweden, and New Zealand, but, again, it's quite unique.
 Most of the exclusive cruises that sail through the Baltic Sea include a long stay in St . Petersburg, Russia.
 This means that you have the option of making a visit to the historic city for a few days during your return trip, sleeping on the boat at night.
 If you only disembark during excursions, a separate visa is not required.
 In the brochures of some cruise lines, Berlin, Germany, appears, but as you can see on the map,
 Flying can be a scary experience for people of any age and background, particularly if they've never been through it or if they've had a traumatic experience.
 No shame should be felt about it: it is no different from other types of personal fears and dislikes that afflict so many others.
 For some, understanding a little bit about how planes work and what happens during a flight can help to ease a fear that stems from a lack of knowledge or a sense of not having control.
 They are paid very well by the courier companies to make fast deliveries, and time is often very important when it comes to commercial documents, goods, or urgent repairs.
 The big companies have their own planes on some routes, but there was a problem for the smaller companies and other routes.
 If they made a shipment by air freight, in some routes it may have been delayed days in the unloading and the customs.
 The only option for making it go faster was to send it as checked baggage, and the airline regulations forbid shipping baggage without a passenger.
 The obvious way to travel first or business class on a plane is to spend a lot of money for that privilege,
 But this comes at a price: in general, you can expect to pay up to four times the economy fare in business class and up to eleven times the economy fare in first class.
 It's usually a waste of time to look for first or business class seats on direct flights.
 The other side of the room is the best place to put it, forcing you to get out of bed to turn it off.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau, and the official language is Romanian, although Russian is also widely spoken.
 Moldova is a Republic composed of many ethnicities, among which have arisen conflicts of this kind.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the formation of the self-proclaimed Transnistria,
 Despite the failure of the political negotiations, economic ties between the two parts of Moldova have been reestablished.
 Orthodox Christianity is the majority religion in Moldova.
 Esmirna is the third most important city in Turkey, with approximately 3.7 million people, the second largest port after Istanbul, and a very good transportation hub.
 The once-upon-a-time ancient city of Izmir is today a modern, evolved, and busy metropolis, established around a wide bay and surrounded by mountains.
 The extensive boulevards, the buildings with mirrored facades, and the vanguard shopping malls are dotted with traditional red tile roofs, from the market of the eighteenth century and from the old mosques and churches.
 The town of Haldarsvik has excursions to the nearby island of Eysturoy and has an atypical octagonal church.
 In the cemetery, there are interesting marble sculptures in the shape of doves on some of the tombs.
 It is worth while to spend half an hour in a walk through the fascinating town.
 Towards the North and within easy reach is the romantic and alucinating city of Sintra, which gained popularity among foreigners after a vivid account of its splendors was written by Lord Byron.
 In Scotturb, bus 403 regularly goes to Sintra and stops at Cabo da Roca.
 Also, you should visit, to the North, the great Santuary of Our Lady of Fatima, which is a place where there were apparitions of the Virgin Mary, famous all over the world.
 And no one knows for certain who wrote it, it is known that early in its life, the large parchment document was rolled up for storage.
 There are still many men and women alive today who survived their time in this place and many more who had loved ones who survived.
 Give it all the dignity, solemnity, and respect it deserves.
 Do not ruin the place by making marks or graffiti on the structures.
 The Catalan and the Spanish are the official languages of Barcelona, and approximately half of its people prefer to speak Catalan,
 But, nevertheless, because Catalan is, legally, the first language of official character, most of the signs are written only in that language.
 But Spanish is also used a lot in public transport and other buildings.
 Although the usual announcements in the Metro are only in Catalan, the unscheduled interruptions are made in a great variety of languages through an automatic program in a great variety of languages, among them, Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians have a reputation for being egocentric, rude, and arrogant.
 Although it's often just an inaccurate stereotype, the best way to enjoy Paris is to behave as well as you can, as a well-bred person.
 A few courteous gestures on her part will quickly dispel the apparent brusque manners of the parisians.
 Plitvice Lakes National Park is very wooded, with mostly beech, fir, and spruce, and it has a mixed alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 It has an extensive and extraordinary range of vegetation, thanks to the variety of microclimates, soils and altitudes.
 This region is also home to a wide variety of animal and bird species.
 The European Brown bear, the Wolf, the Eagle, the Owl, the Lynx, the Wildcat, and the Urogallo, are some of the exotic animals, among many others, that can be found in the place.
 During visits to monasteries, women must wear skirts that cover the knees and cannot wear shoulders exposed.
 Although almost all the monasteries give shelter to women who arrive without being prepared, if you carry your own, especially if it is brightly colored, the monk or the nun will smile at you in the entrance.
 Following the same line, men are required to wear pants that cover their knees.
 This can also be taken from the clothes available at the entrance, but that clothing is not washed after every person wears it, so it may not feel comfortable wearing these skirts.
 The gastronomy of Majorca, like that of other similar regions of the Mediterranean, is based on bread, vegetables and meat, especially pork, and uses olive oil in all its recipes.
 Pa amb Oli is a popular and simple meal, usually eaten in the summer, consisting of bread, tomato and any other ingredients such as cheese or tuna.
 All nouns, as well as the word Sie for you, always carry their initial letter in upper case, even if they are located in the middle of the sentence.
 It's a key method for differentiating between certain verbs and objects.
 It may also be said to simplify the reading, although its writing is somewhat complex, since it is necessary to ascertain whether a verb or an adjective is used in the substantivated form.
 Pronouncing Italian is relatively simple, given that most of its words sound the same as they are written.
 The c and g are the letters with which you must be most attentive, since they are pronounced differently depending on the vowel that follows them.
 As a result, the process of an organization working together to overcome an obstacle can lead to a new innovative process to serve the customer's need.
 Persian grammar is relatively simple and for the most part regular.
 Therefore, the reading of this grammar book will help you to learn much about Persian grammar and to gain a better understanding of Persian sentences.
 It is not necessary to explain that if you master any of the romance languages, it will be easier for you to learn Portuguese.
 But for those who speak some Spanish, it's easy to reach the hurried conclusion that Portuguese is quite similar and that it's unnecessary to study it individually.
 In the present day, generally speaking, pre-modern observatories have become obsolete and remain functioning as museums or educational destinations.
 Given that, in its heyday, light pollution was not a problem of great magnitude as it is today, it is frequent to find them in cities or on campuses, being of easier access than those that are built in the modern times.
 The majority of current research telescopes consist of massive structures installed in remote areas with propitious atmospheric conditions.
 The contemplation of cherry blossoms, called hanami, has been a traditional Japanese pastime since the eighth century.
 The concept came from China, where the flower of the plum tree was the most prized.
 It was the Emperor of Japan who organized the first Cherry Blossom celebrations, only for him and other members of the Imperial Court.
 Plants look their best when they're in a natural environment, so resist the temptation to just pick up a single specimen.
 If you collect specimens during a visit to a formally organised garden, you will be thrown out, without a hearing.
 Singapore is generally a very safe place to be and very easy to get around, plus you can buy almost any product from the moment you arrive.
 But due to its location in the high tropics, a few degrees north of the equator, you'll always have to deal with the heat and, when the sky is clear, with the strong sun, which happens less frequently.
 In addition, some buses head North to Hebron, the site where, according to the Bible, the patriarchs Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob and their wives are buried.
 He must verify that the bus he is about to board is going in the direction of Hebron and not just to Kyriat Arba, which is a Jewish neighborhood that lies near that place.
 Inland waterways can be a good topic for vacation.
 For example, visiting the castles of the Loire Valley, the Rhine Valley, taking a cruise to interesting destinations on the Danube, or cruising on the Erie Canal.
 They also delineate routes for popular hiking and biking trails.
 For the Christian religion, Christmas is one of the most important festivals, in which the birth of Jesus Christ is celebrated.
 There are numerous traditions related to this festival that have been incorporated also by non-believers from both Christian and Non-Christian countries around the world.
 It is a tradition to spend Easter Sunday at sea, watching the sunrise.
 There are, of course, Christian theological explanations of this tradition, but it may well be a pre-Christian spring and fertility ritual.
 The more traditional churches usually offer a Paschal Vigil on the Saturday night during the Easter weekend, and, generally, the congregations begin the celebrations for the resurrection of Christ just as the clock strikes midnight.
 All animals that originally came to the Islands arrived by swimming, flying, or floating.
 Due to their being so far away from the mainland, mammals could not reach the Islands, and this made the giant tortoise the main grazing creature in the Galapagos.
 Many mammal species have been introduced to the Galapagos Islands since man arrived, such as goats, sheep, horses, cows, and pigs, or rodents, dogs, and cats.
 If you travel to the Arctic or Antarctic regions in winter, you will experience the phenomenon of the polar night, which means that the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 Since the sky will be dark almost all day, it's a great time to see the northern lights.
 Thanks to the sparse population that resides in such regions and because of the lack of light pollution, you'll also be able to enjoy the stars.
 In Japan, the workplace culture is much more vertical and formal than what Westerners are likely used to.
 The typical business attire is suits and the colleagues are addressed by their surnames or by their job titles.
 Harmony in the workplace is fundamental, where the group's efforts are emphasized over the focus on individual achievements.
 Workers often have to get approval from their superiors to make decisions and are expected to obey their instructions without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.2647765305720975, 'precisions': [0.5883113322104273, 0.32765020190072197, 0.20165922144224632, 0.12643933668252344], 'brevity_penalty': 1.0, 'length_ratio': 1.032684761943287, 'translation_length': 25529, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 55.83600699886201, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.8468725638898466, 'scores': [0.7872598767280579, 0.8395888209342957, 0.9204304814338684, 0.6916601657867432, 0.7819957733154297, 0.7092058062553406, 0.8118728399276733, 0.8570029139518738, 0.8755306601524353, 0.9311242699623108, 0.8614432215690613, 0.8281728029251099, 0.8688886165618896, 0.8749487996101379, 0.8941296339035034, 0.7987400889396667, 0.878775417804718, 0.9392085075378418, 0.8837218284606934, 0.8409190773963928, 0.9298853278160095, 0.9554428458213806, 0.8173016905784607, 0.8260846734046936, 0.8678529858589172, 0.9178767800331116, 0.8325749039649963, 0.8498165607452393, 0.8428600430488586, 0.8784177899360657, 0.7459609508514404, 0.7098599076271057, 0.8145310878753662, 0.8837568163871765, 0.9239233136177063, 0.8807663917541504, 0.8942156434059143, 0.893900454044342, 0.782417356967926, 0.8821989297866821, 0.8471792936325073, 0.945017397403717, 0.9025172591209412, 0.9083349108695984, 0.8532102108001709, 0.8119450211524963, 0.8503010272979736, 0.9196082949638367, 0.8686702847480774, 0.8388003706932068, 0.9220816493034363, 0.9075884222984314, 0.9061309695243835, 0.9216797947883606, 0.8618680238723755, 0.8046683669090271, 0.8252122402191162, 0.8421350717544556, 0.8294448256492615, 0.9268037676811218, 0.7761095762252808, 0.8979840874671936, 0.821135938167572, 0.9126335382461548, 0.8864086270332336, 0.8588768839836121, 0.7775657773017883, 0.8408216238021851, 0.9162814021110535, 0.8675702810287476, 0.8849990963935852, 0.8267841935157776, 0.8385027050971985, 0.8619337677955627, 0.8106061816215515, 0.8670527935028076, 0.8508025407791138, 0.8668097853660583, 0.9530810117721558, 0.8957968354225159, 0.8357582688331604, 0.7583506107330322, 0.8717851638793945, 0.8310372233390808, 0.8484699130058289, 0.8422567844390869, 0.7881171703338623, 0.8948911428451538, 0.8719657063484192, 0.8282595872879028, 0.8464120030403137, 0.8469461798667908, 0.8877313733100891, 0.8854750990867615, 0.8956523537635803, 0.937906801700592, 0.8664449453353882, 0.7960168719291687, 0.8618757128715515, 0.8613631129264832, 0.8678571581840515, 0.874170184135437, 0.8936722874641418, 0.9007850885391235, 0.7255424857139587, 0.7599738240242004, 0.8518891930580139, 0.8617339730262756, 0.8318470120429993, 0.8271902203559875, 0.9068426489830017, 0.9236804246902466, 0.9261248707771301, 0.9275291562080383, 0.8920078277587891, 0.847642719745636, 0.8486998677253723, 0.8964210748672485, 0.8535392880439758, 0.8652799725532532, 0.698327898979187, 0.8164278268814087, 0.9042160511016846, 0.8944609761238098, 0.8650258183479309, 0.810019314289093, 0.8296477794647217, 0.9055459499359131, 0.8047181963920593, 0.9303523898124695, 0.8980472087860107, 0.8493567705154419, 0.8843106627464294, 0.8644598126411438, 0.851192057132721, 0.8913735747337341, 0.8831352591514587, 0.9055225849151611, 0.9341221451759338, 0.7936732769012451, 0.8245235681533813, 0.7939830422401428, 0.9410037398338318, 0.8815953135490417, 0.8807384371757507, 0.8519888520240784, 0.8767145276069641, 0.920095682144165, 0.8800329566001892, 0.8816325068473816, 0.8649809956550598, 0.8880591988563538, 0.8319646716117859, 0.8286954760551453, 0.8107125163078308, 0.8803160786628723, 0.8557818531990051, 0.73117995262146, 0.8364912867546082, 0.8777952790260315, 0.8513473868370056, 0.6635240912437439, 0.8614101409912109, 0.8610243201255798, 0.9169419407844543, 0.7758604884147644, 0.881367027759552, 0.876017689704895, 0.8108025193214417, 0.8473681211471558, 0.8491762280464172, 0.7562423348426819, 0.9257053732872009, 0.8886208534240723, 0.8976607918739319, 0.9026016592979431, 0.8565571904182434, 0.9260672330856323, 0.8530023694038391, 0.9354270696640015, 0.8486424684524536, 0.9445459842681885, 0.863555371761322, 0.8626316785812378, 0.8450871109962463, 0.8407429456710815, 0.8280758857727051, 0.8299570679664612, 0.8417637944221497, 0.7318887114524841, 0.8653374314308167, 0.8859077095985413, 0.8269580602645874, 0.7471641898155212, 0.9380208849906921, 0.9254088997840881, 0.8781254887580872, 0.8105483651161194, 0.8531481027603149, 0.8470672369003296, 0.8394870162010193, 0.7837037444114685, 0.821685254573822, 0.741421639919281, 0.8735967874526978, 0.8608211874961853, 0.8642408847808838, 0.8301194310188293, 0.9027337431907654, 0.9288055896759033, 0.9252028465270996, 0.8997588157653809, 0.8107317090034485, 0.8287778496742249, 0.9289723634719849, 0.9281579256057739, 0.8807447552680969, 0.8963496088981628, 0.8784569501876831, 0.9181124567985535, 0.849714994430542, 0.8989452719688416, 0.9183821082115173, 0.8988689184188843, 0.9319295287132263, 0.877232551574707, 0.8544397354125977, 0.6878900527954102, 0.8922203779220581, 0.5658643841743469, 0.9054109454154968, 0.9041973352432251, 0.8567153215408325, 0.937487781047821, 0.8252072334289551, 0.8892464637756348, 0.8824533820152283, 0.7842954397201538, 0.9666928052902222, 0.8678709864616394, 0.8085516691207886, 0.6574018597602844, 0.7822431921958923, 0.8475715517997742, 0.8631599545478821, 0.8791974186897278, 0.7950453162193298, 0.5174390077590942, 0.8257381319999695, 0.9170375466346741, 0.8963662981987, 0.9110954403877258, 0.9110122919082642, 0.8948817849159241, 0.8905462622642517, 0.8600119948387146, 0.8911898732185364, 0.9041193127632141, 0.866904079914093, 0.8501017689704895, 0.8954592347145081, 0.7268962264060974, 0.5495145916938782, 0.8838602900505066, 0.8266659379005432, 0.7599088549613953, 0.8554510474205017, 0.8714396357536316, 0.8879400491714478, 0.8324075937271118, 0.8991528749465942, 0.7906482219696045, 0.8815680146217346, 0.8286453485488892, 0.7615271210670471, 0.7747157216072083, 0.6761263012886047, 0.9092170596122742, 0.8615468144416809, 0.802218496799469, 0.9001925587654114, 0.8637771010398865, 0.8956602215766907, 0.8730781674385071, 0.8912349343299866, 0.9290781617164612, 0.8745301961898804, 0.8543557524681091, 0.9009495973587036, 0.5081753730773926, 0.8095962405204773, 0.8352813124656677, 0.8890821933746338, 0.8965091109275818, 0.8335599303245544, 0.8116839528083801, 0.8024816513061523, 0.7886032462120056, 0.814308226108551, 0.8751775622367859, 0.872920572757721, 0.8695550560951233, 0.8370935916900635, 0.8583616614341736, 0.8589913249015808, 0.8178043961524963, 0.7770940065383911, 0.8303468227386475, 0.8865285515785217, 0.881938636302948, 0.889890730381012, 0.9097971320152283, 0.884891927242279, 0.7240154147148132, 0.9384180307388306, 0.9028436541557312, 0.8602188229560852, 0.8951449990272522, 0.8974698781967163, 0.8730430006980896, 0.7099888920783997, 0.5522840619087219, 0.8649104237556458, 0.873063325881958, 0.8819858431816101, 0.8561479449272156, 0.8551284670829773, 0.8713952898979187, 0.9098911285400391, 0.852169930934906, 0.8962309956550598, 0.7915440201759338, 0.8780032396316528, 0.7845094799995422, 0.8925080895423889, 0.8632373809814453, 0.8924817442893982, 0.8004236817359924, 0.839552104473114, 0.8867313265800476, 0.8353293538093567, 0.7109541296958923, 0.83381587266922, 0.8434589505195618, 0.9303440451622009, 0.8584998846054077, 0.8714601397514343, 0.8473652005195618, 0.7856734395027161, 0.7898023724555969, 0.8906628489494324, 0.8031319975852966, 0.8508664965629578, 0.9096069931983948, 0.9206719994544983, 0.8830190300941467, 0.8783713579177856, 0.8370523452758789, 0.8394874930381775, 0.8536506295204163, 0.833620011806488, 0.9066110849380493, 0.8948258757591248, 0.8335384726524353, 0.9033983945846558, 0.7045121788978577, 0.7663303017616272, 0.8568930625915527, 0.7599805593490601, 0.8058871626853943, 0.7748035788536072, 0.625184953212738, 0.592083752155304, 0.8994767665863037, 0.8813625574111938, 0.862795889377594, 0.9183726906776428, 0.9077882170677185, 0.8480132818222046, 0.8363285660743713, 0.8785752654075623, 0.9003328680992126, 0.7362995147705078, 0.6515300869941711, 0.8508151769638062, 0.859976053237915, 0.7301945686340332, 0.8618661165237427, 0.8623029589653015, 0.876417338848114, 0.859955370426178, 0.9208667278289795, 0.9228405356407166, 0.8936504125595093, 0.8451182842254639, 0.8332128524780273, 0.7761099934577942, 0.9506706595420837, 0.7843413949012756, 0.8966020941734314, 0.8871558308601379, 0.900633692741394, 0.821349561214447, 0.7072932720184326, 0.8426580429077148, 0.8982844948768616, 0.8134593367576599, 0.858599841594696, 0.8488561511039734, 0.9126784205436707, 0.8733025193214417, 0.8195789456367493, 0.8372640013694763, 0.9131230711936951, 0.9038463234901428, 0.7164516448974609, 0.8863567113876343, 0.827228844165802, 0.9033514857292175, 0.8453369736671448, 0.8878287672996521, 0.8441154360771179, 0.8856328725814819, 0.8232239484786987, 0.8374730348587036, 0.9127529263496399, 0.8798573613166809, 0.8889004588127136, 0.8679311871528625, 0.9524733424186707, 0.8718764781951904, 0.7893844246864319, 0.8765279054641724, 0.6155088543891907, 0.808738648891449, 0.8122511506080627, 0.8521613478660583, 0.910264253616333, 0.8871205449104309, 0.8778141736984253, 0.901218831539154, 0.8469341397285461, 0.9446350932121277, 0.877483606338501, 0.8368371725082397, 0.8694251179695129, 0.9213181138038635, 0.9190767407417297, 0.8952496647834778, 0.7440147995948792, 0.8590946197509766, 0.8690586686134338, 0.9169819951057434, 0.867997944355011, 0.8855036497116089, 0.8536036014556885, 0.6988748908042908, 0.8921047449111938, 0.8076894879341125, 0.8510800004005432, 0.8509982228279114, 0.7230592966079712, 0.8518185019493103, 0.8668236136436462, 0.8502794504165649, 0.37962785363197327, 0.8760382533073425, 0.3841514587402344, 0.7350274324417114, 0.7303715348243713, 0.8494835495948792, 0.5822741985321045, 0.8801224231719971, 0.8093637228012085, 0.7983127236366272, 0.8284382224082947, 0.8287895917892456, 0.9074980616569519, 0.8666505813598633, 0.8994140625, 0.8775484561920166, 0.8452110886573792, 0.8949941992759705, 0.9010985493659973, 0.8940374851226807, 0.879173219203949, 0.8711174726486206, 0.8332182765007019, 0.8685829639434814, 0.8538811802864075, 0.8634816408157349, 0.83503258228302, 0.8925476670265198, 0.9009336829185486, 0.8277647495269775, 0.8744776844978333, 0.8924675583839417, 0.8717014789581299, 0.9021745324134827, 0.8504937291145325, 0.9188550710678101, 0.9301725029945374, 0.8389360308647156, 0.8566325902938843, 0.7612020373344421, 0.8126111030578613, 0.8333959579467773, 0.8258447647094727, 0.8329707980155945, 0.8035290837287903, 0.7563658356666565, 0.8017081618309021, 0.8239768743515015, 0.847766101360321, 0.8860928416252136, 0.9158613085746765, 0.7995722889900208, 0.8576325178146362, 0.8576878905296326, 0.8467068076133728, 0.8661012053489685, 0.8186759948730469, 0.8751800656318665, 0.4359939396381378, 0.8902047872543335, 0.8991971611976624, 0.8610854744911194, 0.7831908464431763, 0.852875828742981, 0.8841650485992432, 0.8437673449516296, 0.8608645796775818, 0.8018811345100403, 0.8435512185096741, 0.786122739315033, 0.5197879672050476, 0.835359513759613, 0.8417622447013855, 0.7794734835624695, 0.9065003991127014, 0.8596816658973694, 0.8629990220069885, 0.8582207560539246, 0.8482328057289124, 0.8662834763526917, 0.9220901727676392, 0.8544334769248962, 0.8789888620376587, 0.7902811765670776, 0.9173220992088318, 0.8271885514259338, 0.7777740359306335, 0.7798485159873962, 0.8811911344528198, 0.92912358045578, 0.8128326535224915, 0.7975258827209473, 0.8494575619697571, 0.8116065263748169, 0.8407749533653259, 0.9014309048652649, 0.9050033688545227, 0.8316690325737, 0.8806970715522766, 0.8835572600364685, 0.8946391940116882, 0.8366673588752747, 0.8943306803703308, 0.8470545411109924, 0.7091004252433777, 0.8842220306396484, 0.8713217377662659, 0.7331683039665222, 0.7584272027015686, 0.856770932674408, 0.861060380935669, 0.8278852105140686, 0.8213719725608826, 0.8914037942886353, 0.881886899471283, 0.8491950035095215, 0.908145546913147, 0.8335046768188477, 0.8599364161491394, 0.6080073714256287, 0.8711536526679993, 0.8084229230880737, 0.9002593159675598, 0.8071666955947876, 0.9141829013824463, 0.9004905819892883, 0.891212522983551, 0.8233736157417297, 0.8785812854766846, 0.8575670123100281, 0.8891249895095825, 0.8838260769844055, 0.894509494304657, 0.8508808016777039, 0.878767192363739, 0.8353438973426819, 0.8631309270858765, 0.8947192430496216, 0.9069874286651611, 0.8783259987831116, 0.9249472618103027, 0.8151558637619019, 0.839301347732544, 0.79593425989151, 0.85792475938797, 0.883429229259491, 0.8993257880210876, 0.7033172845840454, 0.8820875287055969, 0.819871723651886, 0.8730795979499817, 0.901849091053009, 0.6901469230651855, 0.8645380139350891, 0.8646231889724731, 0.9595370888710022, 0.6678783297538757, 0.8867901563644409, 0.8658426403999329, 0.7692977786064148, 0.8630331158638, 0.895011842250824, 0.9074331521987915, 0.8924794793128967, 0.8447054624557495, 0.8579142093658447, 0.9029906392097473, 0.8751916885375977, 0.8714941740036011, 0.8466336727142334, 0.9129225015640259, 0.9134355187416077, 0.8262320756912231, 0.9110183119773865, 0.8909364342689514, 0.8290254473686218, 0.9242397546768188, 0.8190370202064514, 0.8080219030380249, 0.8505070209503174, 0.7876664996147156, 0.5714422464370728, 0.8844084143638611, 0.8079321384429932, 0.8815808296203613, 0.9227731823921204, 0.9213966727256775, 0.8573182225227356, 0.8276911377906799, 0.8644365072250366, 0.9130542874336243, 0.9060947895050049, 0.8297504186630249, 0.8381444215774536, 0.7808079719543457, 0.8336424231529236, 0.9092422127723694, 0.8309470415115356, 0.8863977789878845, 0.9264364242553711, 0.8355036377906799, 0.5286228060722351, 0.8263223767280579, 0.8088918328285217, 0.8956620097160339, 0.7905890941619873, 0.9291577935218811, 0.9225074648857117, 0.8912188410758972, 0.891434371471405, 0.9008722305297852, 0.8924034237861633, 0.9007194638252258, 0.8742761611938477, 0.9166190028190613, 0.8773446083068848, 0.946754515171051, 0.8859657645225525, 0.8702943921089172, 0.8652050495147705, 0.922423243522644, 0.8810405135154724, 0.8580814599990845, 0.906110942363739, 0.6557905673980713, 0.9047970175743103, 0.8484918475151062, 0.891260027885437, 0.8200618624687195, 0.8723737001419067, 0.9220404624938965, 0.7428170442581177, 0.8969907164573669, 0.8757750391960144, 0.628588855266571, 0.8120453357696533, 0.8594985604286194, 0.8549871444702148, 0.8537800312042236, 0.842655599117279, 0.8757657408714294, 0.784466564655304, 0.8696520924568176, 0.9036619663238525, 0.8792899250984192, 0.8962833285331726, 0.8036054372787476, 0.9055378437042236, 0.8792500495910645, 0.8507034182548523, 0.831184446811676, 0.7992016673088074, 0.7802110910415649, 0.9025664925575256, 0.937095582485199, 0.8831748366355896, 0.8845845460891724, 0.8678635954856873, 0.9172728657722473, 0.8735184669494629, 0.9085311889648438, 0.8896941542625427, 0.8290978670120239, 0.7243497967720032, 0.866660475730896, 0.7191236019134521, 0.9075849652290344, 0.8326043486595154, 0.9019613862037659, 0.8306093811988831, 0.883048951625824, 0.8847108483314514, 0.858180820941925, 0.8552775979042053, 0.8707378506660461, 0.7722342610359192, 0.8089258074760437, 0.8364888429641724, 0.8706287145614624, 0.877980649471283, 0.869068443775177, 0.8832158446311951, 0.8764171004295349, 0.9200341105461121, 0.8964595198631287, 0.9513906836509705, 0.9252756834030151, 0.8333768248558044, 0.8426024317741394, 0.6967661380767822, 0.8311715722084045, 0.8267313838005066, 0.8038783669471741, 0.831203281879425, 0.8790704607963562, 0.9270493388175964, 0.9214946031570435, 0.9136496186256409, 0.9068400263786316, 0.8846367001533508, 0.8550319075584412, 0.6992430090904236, 0.8674882650375366, 0.9103559851646423, 0.9593293070793152, 0.8778952956199646, 0.8341417908668518, 0.8680512309074402, 0.8375820517539978, 0.8850780129432678, 0.8828582167625427, 0.8071653246879578, 0.7558771967887878, 0.7681456208229065, 0.8026654720306396, 0.9025353789329529, 0.8142042756080627, 0.9259329438209534, 0.8892395496368408, 0.8942749500274658, 0.7368285059928894, 0.8981443047523499, 0.8540253043174744, 0.8720734715461731, 0.8937699198722839, 0.9318860769271851, 0.8113406300544739, 0.8952208161354065, 0.8737666010856628, 0.8807321786880493, 0.7724472880363464, 0.966712474822998, 0.8187500834465027, 0.7823246121406555, 0.7268159985542297, 0.856237530708313, 0.7938995957374573, 0.9113944172859192, 0.8712931275367737, 0.7770845890045166, 0.8693024516105652, 0.40189680457115173, 0.9166108965873718, 0.905364990234375, 0.8465085029602051, 0.8725455403327942, 0.7630849480628967, 0.8851893544197083, 0.8872933983802795, 0.882637619972229, 0.582459032535553, 0.842664897441864, 0.7406428456306458, 0.7609120011329651, 0.8619169592857361, 0.9347650408744812, 0.8752181529998779, 0.8619341254234314, 0.7344531416893005, 0.9070067405700684, 0.876991868019104, 0.7609804272651672, 0.8831743001937866, 0.8934829831123352, 0.8855639100074768, 0.8242142796516418, 0.8150987029075623, 0.8679964542388916, 0.8116572499275208, 0.8586034774780273, 0.862903892993927, 0.8905923366546631, 0.7610310912132263, 0.8556848168373108, 0.9042899012565613, 0.47229698300361633, 0.8223565220832825, 0.3795785903930664, 0.8819032907485962, 0.7117147445678711, 0.8366716504096985, 0.7415758371353149, 0.8750147819519043, 0.7787407040596008, 0.9010530710220337, 0.8944259881973267, 0.9074563384056091, 0.8903312087059021, 0.7025852203369141, 0.7499339580535889, 0.7844840288162231, 0.8431035280227661, 0.9146149754524231, 0.8983636498451233, 0.8301673531532288, 0.7966544032096863, 0.7913914322853088, 0.9131317734718323, 0.89643794298172, 0.8265780210494995, 0.849671483039856, 0.8102701306343079, 0.7729352116584778, 0.8799722790718079, 0.814365029335022, 0.8823407292366028, 0.865914523601532, 0.9049882292747498, 0.9134133458137512, 0.8851671814918518, 0.8807658553123474, 0.8529387712478638, 0.8705493807792664, 0.9604339003562927, 0.7232188582420349, 0.8733375072479248, 0.9101279377937317, 0.9298821687698364, 0.8715723156929016, 0.7998736500740051, 0.8695622086524963, 0.8963345289230347, 0.8623936772346497, 0.8025495409965515, 0.8290961384773254, 0.8782277703285217, 0.8523289561271667, 0.7871344685554504, 0.7083081603050232, 0.8937827944755554, 0.860928475856781, 0.9112545251846313, 0.8434234857559204, 0.9146347641944885, 0.9007361531257629, 0.8340526223182678, 0.8576769232749939, 0.8352669477462769, 0.894818127155304, 0.8798232674598694, 0.885289192199707, 0.8354294300079346, 0.8637842535972595, 0.8134059309959412, 0.9223684668540955, 0.8757912516593933, 0.8495847582817078, 0.8923738598823547, 0.8880307078361511, 0.8979142308235168, 0.8843692541122437, 0.8931763768196106, 0.8861294388771057, 0.8673924207687378, 0.88094562292099, 0.8909260034561157, 0.6971814036369324, 0.8786703944206238, 0.8217158317565918, 0.8023136854171753, 0.6490975022315979, 0.8787402510643005, 0.8421277403831482, 0.8879808783531189, 0.8406071662902832, 0.9056389331817627, 0.805199921131134, 0.8025912642478943, 0.7759333252906799, 0.8229772448539734, 0.7932775616645813, 0.3758482038974762, 0.9179766774177551, 0.8337764739990234, 0.7521193027496338, 0.9182774424552917, 0.9482494592666626, 0.9186813235282898, 0.8414570689201355, 0.7143155336380005, 0.8106276392936707, 0.8787221312522888, 0.8624341487884521, 0.8500025868415833, 0.9052768349647522, 0.7873215675354004, 0.491036593914032, 0.7283911108970642, 0.744522750377655, 0.867816150188446, 0.847628653049469, 0.8318292498588562, 0.8373971581459045, 0.8069646954536438, 0.9659206867218018, 0.7204620242118835, 0.7812767624855042, 0.9018219113349915, 0.8845908641815186, 0.9532248973846436, 0.7854604721069336, 0.8679800629615784, 0.7855505347251892, 0.907653272151947, 0.7446373105049133, 0.8910373449325562, 0.8308336138725281, 0.7776062488555908, 0.9086609482765198, 0.8434844613075256, 0.8724693655967712, 0.8181566596031189, 0.4264744222164154, 0.9011850953102112, 0.8585243821144104, 0.804513156414032, 0.8396609425544739, 0.8938823938369751, 0.8110915422439575, 0.8982536792755127, 0.8789137601852417, 0.8511201739311218, 0.8239508867263794, 0.85978764295578, 0.7890444397926331, 0.912159264087677, 0.8612360954284668, 0.8783164620399475, 0.8159794211387634, 0.8597789406776428, 0.8830035328865051, 0.9368957281112671, 0.9127486348152161, 0.8689836859703064, 0.7537659406661987, 0.9290820956230164, 0.8365172743797302, 0.9181811213493347, 0.8094717264175415, 0.8613390326499939, 0.8953783512115479, 0.7517728805541992, 0.8373492956161499, 0.8984906077384949, 0.8651683926582336, 0.8805755376815796, 0.8980348110198975]}